http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/M/MILITARY_SECRETS_CHINA?SITE=NJMOR&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Daily Record - Nation & World Subscribe to our Daily Report newsletter May 11, 7:24 AM EDT Engineer Guilty in Military Secrets Case Search the DOD Surplus Database GAO Report on Military Recruiting Army Tries Incentives to Keep Officers Pentagon to Fortify Force in Afghanistan Security at Bases at 2nd-Lowest Level U.S. Commander Laments Civilian Killings Soldiers Face Punishment Over Blogs China Names Special Envoy for Darfur China to Start Mobile Food Testing Japan Rules Against War Claims China: Pig Disease Could Spread China Zeroes in on Food and Drug Safety ANA, Calif. (AP) -- After a six-week trial, a federal jury convicted a Chinese-born engineer of conspiring to export U.S. defense technology to China, including data on an electronic propulsion system that could make submarines virtually undetectable. Friends and colleagues knew Chi Mak as an unassuming, brilliant man who worked 12-hour days as an engineer for a defense contractor, rarely went out and scrimped to pay off his 700-square-foot suburban home. Federal prosecutors portrayed Mak as a polished agent for the Chinese who used his low-key lifestyle and good reputation as a cover for his real work - conspiring to pass U.S. secrets for more than two decades. The jury sided with the government, also finding Mak guilty of acting as an unregistered foreign agent, attempting to violate export control laws and making false statements to the FBI. Prosecutors had dropped a charge of the actual export of defense articles. Mak stared straight ahead and seemed to hold back tears as the verdict was read. One of his attorneys gently rubbed his back. Assistant U.S. Attorney Greg Staples said Mak faces up to 45 years in prison when he is sentenced Sept. 10. "We were confident from the start and we're very happy with the verdict," Staples said. The government accused Mak, a naturalized U.S. citizen, of taking thousands of pages of documents from his defense contractor employer, Power Paragon of Anaheim, and giving them to his brother, who passed them along to Chinese authorities over a number of years. Mak was arrested in 2005 in Los Angeles after FBI agents stopped his brother and sister-in-law as they boarded a flight to Hong Kong. Investigators said they found three encrypted CDs in their luggage that contained documents on a submarine propulsion system, a solid-state power switch for ships and a Power Point presentation on the future of power electronics. Mak acknowledged during the trial that he copied classified documents from his employer and kept copies in his office. He maintained he didn't realize that making the copies was illegal. Chi Mak's wife, brother and other relatives also have been indicted and go on trial together on June 5. Staples said the government may use the verdict to try to negotiate plea bargains with Mak's indicted family members, who pleaded not guilty. Defense attorneys Marilyn Bednarski and Ronald Kaye said they would appeal the verdict, insisting the government had manipulated the facts. In many instances, the government was allowed to present classified information to U.S. District Judge Cormac Carney in his chambers, and the defense team was not allowed to view the government's application for a warrant to bug Mak's house and car, Kaye said. "It is so absurd to believe that he has been passing technology for 20 years when they had not one witness and not one piece of paper to corroborate this," Kaye said. The trial featured testimony from FBI agents, U.S. Navy officials, encryption and espionage experts and the engineer himself. Key to the trial was the government's allegation that Mak confessed to the conspiracy - and even named his so-called "handler" and specific restricted documents - during an untaped jailhouse interview two days after his arrest. Mak testified he never confessed during that interview, but admitted on cross-examination that he lied repeatedly in an earlier taped interview about the number of times he had visited China and when he told authorities he didn't have friends or relatives there. He said he felt intimidated during the interrogation. "This is why I lied," he said. "They were pushing me that night." Mak's attorneys focused on a paper he had written on the propulsion system that was found in his brother's luggage at Los Angeles International Airport. Mak said he believed he was doing nothing wrong by giving the paper to his brother to take out of the country because he had written it for Power Paragon and had presented it at an engineering conference in 2004. The government, however, alleged the documents were export-controlled and couldn't fall into foreigners' hands.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/V/VIRGINIA_TECH_GRADUATION?SITE=NJMOR&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Daily Record - Nation & World Subscribe to our Daily Report newsletter May 11, 6:16 PM EDT Va. Tech Graduations Honor Slain Victims Virginia Tech Prepares for Commencement Dan O'Neil Memorial Concert Tech Shooting Coverage Students Return to Classes Slain Singer Honored With Concert Virginia Tech: A Self-Portrait Portraits of the Victims Timeline of Seung-Hui Cho's Life The Victims: A Family Mourns The Victims: Holocaust Survivor Saves Students Memorials: Field of Grief Search Warrants for Cho's Computer, Phone and Medical Records (ABC News) Cho's Mental Health Records Objects Seized from Cho's Room Va. Tech Graduations Honor Slain Victims Va. Tech Review Panel Holds 1st Meeting Gen. Abizaid to Give Va. Tech Speech URL Buyers Hope to Cash in on Tragedy Va. Tech Seniors Prepare for Transition Va. Tech to Honor Victims at Graduation Cho Didn't Get Court-Ordered Treatment Bomb Warning Found Before Tech Shooting Opinions Vary on Fate of Va. Tech Hall Va. Tech Fields Merchandise Requests BLACKSBURG, Va. (AP) -- Thousands of Virginia Tech graduates struggled to balance joy with grief as commencement ceremonies got under way Friday, less than a month after a student gunman's rampage devastated the campus. In an address to about 600 of the nearly 1,200 graduate students who received master's degrees, President Charles Steger spoke to the community's grief while encouraging the graduates to be proud of their accomplishments and hopeful for their futures. "Our hearts are saddened and our minds are troubled," Steger said. A larger ceremony for some 3,600 graduating seniors was set for Friday evening, where the school planned to issue class rings to relatives of the 26 slain students, followed by diplomas in smaller ceremonies Saturday. "Short was their stay on this mortal stage. Great was their impact," Steger said of the slain students. Gunman Seung-Hui Cho also killed five faculty members and himself. His family will not receive a ring or diploma. During the graduate ceremonies, nine slain graduate students were awarded posthumous master's degrees or doctorates. Faculty members hugged the relatives who received them, some wiping away tears and all drawing long and loud applause from the crowd of several thousand. Graduate Scott Cassell, 55, of Roanoke, hadn't planned to attend the commencement ceremonies. But after the attacks, the father of five decided he would go as a show of support for the grieving families. "I just can't fathom the loss," said Cassell, who received a master's degree in information technology. Security employees checked the bags of guests, armed police officers patrolled the grounds and state troopers stood guard at every entrance. Guests did not have to pass through metal detectors, though, and school officials said the level of security was comparable to what they would see at a home football game. James Long, whose sister, Michelle, earned a degree in history, said students would not let the tragedy overshadow their celebration. "There are too many people here to celebrate five, six years of hard work to let one guy screw that up," said Long, 25, of Richmond. Some families couldn't bear to attend graduation. Others said they had no choice but to come. "We have to. This is right for us," said Peter Read, whose freshman daughter Mary Karen Read was among those killed. Peter and Cathy Read returned to campus for more than their daughter's degree. They also returned to erase an unsettling image from the minds of their two youngest sons, Patrick, 4, and Brendan, 2. "They're a little concerned that the bad man's going to shoot them," Cathy Read said. "We can't let that idea grow in their heads." In Washington, President Bush issued a statement praising "the compassion and resilient spirit" of the Virginia Tech community and the 3,600 graduating seniors and others earning advanced or associate degrees. "Laura and I salute the Virginia Tech Class of 2007. We also remember the students and teachers whose lives were taken last month," he said. "They will always hold a special place in the hearts of this graduating class and an entire nation." Twins Andrea and Michelle Falletti of Chantilly, Va., said the shootings will not be what they remember when they look back on four years of college. Rather, they will recall spring breaks, camping trips and partying with friends. "Obviously, what has happened has affected everything in our lives, and it will affect graduation," said Andrea Falletti, 21. "In a way, it's not going to be celebrating us as much; it's more about what we've done as a community. But that's OK. I'm proud of what we've done here." Associated Press writers Sue Lindsey and Vicki Smith contributed to this report.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/F/FORT_DIX_PLOT?SITE=NJMOR&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Daily Record - Nation & World Subscribe to our Daily Report newsletter May 11, 4:21 PM EDT Fort Dix Suspects All Are Denied Bail complaint against Eljvir Duka in Fort Dix plot case Hearing Transcript: Waleed Mohammed bin Attash Hearing Transcript: Khalid Sheikh Mohammed Hearing Transcript Abu Faraj al-Libi Hearing Transcript: Ramzi Binalshibh Declassified Report: Iraq 'Cause Celebre' for Extremists U.S. Pushing Europe for Flight Data Deal Bush's Privacy Board Not Doing Its Job? British Police Make 4 Terror Arrests Doctor in Terror Trial Defends Himself Dix Plot Shows Homegrown Radical Threat CAMDEN, N.J. (AP) -- Six Muslim men suspected of plotting to massacre U.S. soldiers at Fort Dix were ordered held without bail Friday. Prosecutors argued that the men, all born outside the United States, pose a flight risk. They are being held at a federal detention center in Philadelphia. The men were arrested Monday during what the FBI said was an attempt to buy AK-47 machine guns, M-16s and other weapons. They targeted Fort Dix, a post 25 miles east of Philadelphia that is used primarily to train reservists, partly because one of them had delivered pizzas there and was familiar with the base, according to court filings. Their objective was to kill "as many American soldiers as possible," the documents said. The men have lived in and around Philadelphia for years, worshipped at moderate mosques and worked blue-collar jobs installing roofs, driving a cab, delivering pizzas and baking bread. Four are ethnic Albanians from the former Yugoslavia, one is from Jordan and one is from Turkey. As they were led into the courtroom, each of the suspects smiled to relatives and friends, many of whom wept and blew kisses to them. Only one of the men, Mohamad Ibrahim Shnewer, 22, asked to be released on bail, and friends and relatives offered to post properties they owned as collateral. Assistant U.S. Attorney Stephen Stigall argued against letting Shnewer be released to the custody of his parents while awaiting trial. He said many of the illegal actions that the government alleges Shnewer committed happened or were planned at his parents' house. Defense lawyers for some of the men said they are considering attacking the prosecution's reliance on two paid informants who infiltrated the group more than a year ago and recorded conversations with the defendants. Authorities said they first learned about the men in January 2006 after a tip from a clerk at a Mount Laurel electronics store. Circuit City spokeswoman Jackie Foreman said Friday that credit for the tip is shared by two employees. She declined to name them but said the company has "communicated its appreciation." She declined to give details. The pair called police because a home video the men wanted transferred to a DVD looked like it might have terrorist links, U.S. Attorney Christopher J. Christie said. Earlier this year, authorities said, the men took a training trip to the Pocono Mountains in Pennsylvania, where they fired weapons and played paintball to prepare for an attack. Five of the men - Shnewer; Serdar Tatar, 23; Dritan "Anthony" or "Tony" Duka, 28; Shain Duka, 26; and Eljvir "Elvis" Duka, 23 - are charged with conspiring to kill uniformed military personnel, an offense punishable by life in prison. Agron Abdullahu, 24, is charged with helping illegal immigrants obtain weapons. He could face 10 years in prison if convicted. Abdullahu, who faces the least serious charges of the six, will have another bail hearing next Thursday.
http://hosted.ap.org/ News from The Associated Press
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/S/SHOCK_JOCKS_SEX_COMMENT?SITE=NJMOR&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Daily Record - Nation & World Subscribe to our Daily Report newsletter May 11, 5:05 PM EDT XM Shock Jocks Apologize for Sex Comment (AP) -- XM Satellite Radio shock jocks Opie and Anthony apologized Friday for airing a homeless man's crude comments that he'd like to have sex with Condoleezza Rice, Laura Bush and Queen Elizabeth. The remarks were made on their show Wednesday by a guest the duo call Homeless Charlie. As the name of each woman came up, the guest said he would like to have sex with her - using language not fit for print. Opie and Anthony laughed as they imagined Rice's "horror" while describing a violent sexual encounter in which Rice is punched in the face. Washington-based XM condemned the remarks. "We deplore the comments made on Wednesday's 'Opie & Anthony Show,'" XM spokesman Nathaniel Brown told The Associated Press on Friday. He would not say whether XM planned to take disciplinary action. Opie and Anthony, whose full names are Anthony Cumia and Greg "Opie" Hughes, apologized to listeners on Friday's show. "We apologize to the public officials for comments that we made on our XM show on May 9th. We take very seriously the responsibility that comes with our creative freedom and regret any offense that this segment has caused," they said. Because the show airs on satellite radio, there are no federal restrictions on its content. According to XM's Web site, the radio service has parental controls that allow users to block access to channels that frequently contain explicit language. Those channels are designated with an "XL" notation. The same radio duo was dumped by CBS Radio in August 2002 for running a contest in which they said two listeners had sex in New York's St. Patrick's Cathedral. They were hired by XM in 2004. The remarks could become an issue as XM seeks approval from the Federal Communications Commission to merge with New York-based Sirius Satellite Radio, said Tom Taylor, editor of the trade magazine Inside Radio. "XM and Sirius don't want any regulation," he said in Friday's New York Daily News. "But it's come up in four congressional hearings - and at this point, the merger is such a close call, any issue could become important." The FCC did not return phone calls Friday seeking comment.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/S/SCHOOL_EVACUATION?SITE=NJMOR&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Daily Record - Nation & World Subscribe to our Daily Report newsletter May 11, 5:13 PM EDT Md. School Evacuated Over Odd Bottle Md. (AP) -- A high school was evacuated Friday after firefighters found a bottle containing a suspicious liquid in a classroom, and a teacher was taken to a hospital for dizziness. A student was arrested hours later. Police aren't releasing the 18-year-old man's name until formal charges are drawn up, Baltimore County police spokesman Bill Toohey said. The bottle found in a trash can smelled like chlorine but the investigation was still continuing into whether it was intended to be an incendiary device, Toohey said. "It was a bottle that contained a toxic substance," Toohey said. Police said the affected area involved a chemistry lab, a bathroom and a hallway at Dulaney High School in a suburb of Baltimore. The ill teacher was taken to a local hospital, Sgt. John Young of the Baltimore County Police Department said. No other injuries were reported. The fire department's hazardous materials team and members of the county police bomb squad were on the scene as a precaution, Jones said. The incident was reported just before 8 a.m., Young said. The school's 1,850 students were allowed to return to the building around 11 a.m.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/S/SUSPICIOUS_DEVICES?SITE=NJMOR&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Daily Record - Nation & World Subscribe to our Daily Report newsletter May 11, 4:28 PM EDT Men Apologize for Boston Cartoon Stunt Guerrilla Marketing Goes Awry BOSTON (AP) -- Prosecutors said they would not pursue charges against two men who planted electronic devices around the city as part of a botched advertising campaign after the pair apologized Friday for causing a bomb scare. Peter Berdovsky, 27, and Sean Stevens, 28, also performed community service at a rehabilitation center in a deal with prosecutors. In contrast to their first court appearance in January, when they mugged for the camera and waved to friends in the courtroom, the men offered contrite apologies and said they never expected the stunt to cause any turmoil. "I deeply regret that this incident caused such anguish and disruption to so many people," Berdovsky told the Charlestown District Court. Stevens said he saw the devices simply as "harmless entertainment." "I had no intention of upsetting or alarming anyone," he said. The two were accused of planting about three dozen battery-powered devices in Boston and Cambridge on Jan. 31. The devices, a promotion for Cartoon Network, had lights that created images of a cartoon character making an obscene gesture. Fears of terrorism arose when the devices were discovered in a subway station and on a bridge, among other locations. Bomb squads were deployed, and highways, bridges and some transit stations were temporarily closed. Similar signs were placed in nine other cities around the United States, but only in Boston did they elicit such a response. Berdovsky and Stevens were charged with placing a hoax device and disorderly conduct. Attorney General Martha Coakley said it would have been difficult to prove to a jury that the men intended to create panic, and that she did not believe they realized the problems the ads would cause. "We believe this was an appropriate and fair resolution," Coakley said. Berdovsky said he was relieved the case was resolved without a trial. "I am looking forward to what the future has to bring. I'm just going to be working really hard and working on my art and working to build a really peaceful community for all of us to live in," Berdovsky told The Associated Press by telephone after the hearing. Berdovsky performed 80 hours of service and Stevens completed 60 hours at the Spaulding Rehabilitation Center in Boston. The men designed a cartoon mural that will be painted in a waiting area for children undergoing physical therapy, said Oz Mondejar, Spaulding's vice president of human resources. They also helped patients use computers, cleaned the hospital's sailing docks and helped produce a DVD featuring patients talking about their rehabilitation successes. Turner Broadcasting and the advertising agency that carried out the campaign, Interference Inc., agreed to pay a $2 million settlement to cover costs and restitution for the law enforcement response. The head of the Cartoon Network resigned nine days after the stunt.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/S/SOCAL_FIRE?SITE=NJMOR&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Daily Record - Nation & World Subscribe to our Daily Report newsletter May 11, 4:22 PM EDT S. Calif. Island Fire Turned From Town Fire Threatens Posh, SoCal Resort Island Wildfires Across the U.S. Photos: Wildfire Burns in California Charges Against Crew Boss Calif. Island Survives Wildfire Scare 2 Kids Charged in Ga. Wildfires Ga. Wildfire Called 'A Long-Term Battle' AVALON, Calif. (AP) -- Firefighters turned back flames that threatened Santa Catalina Island's main city and some residents planned to return to their homes Friday after thousands were forced to evacuate a day earlier. The wildfire was 4,000 acres, or more than 6 square miles, and was only 10 percent contained early Friday. But worries were eased by the day's favorable weather forecast and the arrival of dozens of fire trucks and air tankers on the narrow, mountainous island 30 miles off Los Angeles. "Everyone is working very hard to make sure that the people are safe and the animals are safe," Gov. Arnold Schwarzenegger said Friday. Most of the 76-square-mile island is owned by a land conservancy, home to wildlife including the Catalina Island fox, North American bison and bald eagle. Flames that had menaced the main city of Avalon the night before were no longer visible from there on Friday. But a layer of ash and a puff of smoke that rose from a hillside overlooking the crescent harbor were reminders of a harrowing night. "The risk has been reduced significantly," Fire Chief Steven Hoefs said. "Most of the structures have been protected." The blaze broke out Thursday afternoon in the island's rugged interior, feeding on dry brush and fanned by a steady wind into the night. One home and a few small structures in the canyons outside the city burned. About 3,800 residents and tourists fled, Schwarzenegger said. As people lined up at the harbor Thursday night to board ferries to the mainland, many covered their faces with towels and bandanas to ward off ashes. Resident Kathy Troeger fled with her three children and a friend's daughter, while her husband, a fire captain, stayed behind to fight the blaze. "It was like a nightmare when we left," she said after arriving at the mainland port of Long Beach. "You couldn't breathe, and ash was falling like snow." Anita Bussing, a therapist who has a second home on the island, described a sky "completely gray with orange streaks." The helicopters were flying all over the place," she said. "People were freaking out, children were crying." Island hotel worker Susana Garcia, 22, waited long into the night at the dock looking for her father. She had gone to the mainland to do errands before the fire started and was unable to reach her father, who had stayed behind. "I've been asking everybody if they've seen him, but I haven't found him yet," Garcia said. Dozens of fire engines arrived through the night from as far away as Fresno, carried by giant military hovercraft from the Marine Corps' Camp Pendleton. One firefighter was overcome by inhalation and was in stable condition. Wind that reached 20 mph Thursday calmed and were expected to blow the fire westward, away from Avalon and toward the island's sparsely populated center. Despite being well offshore, Catalina has been left parched by the lack of rainfall that has made the rest of Southern California particularly susceptible to wildfires like the one in Los Angeles' Griffith Park this week. Television actor Steven W. Bailey, who lives near the park, had gone to Catalina with his wife to escape the smoke and heat on Thursday. As they approached the island, he spotted the smoke of the island blaze, and when they arrived, they weren't allowed to check into their hotel. "It just descended into more and more fire, more and more smoke, more and more ash," Bailey told KABC-TV. Firefighters were still working Friday to surround what remained of the Griffith Park fire, which briefly chased people from homes and threatened the park's landmark observatory and zoo. Elsewhere around the country, firefighters battled the second Georgia wildfire to burn more than 100,000 acres as gusty wind spread the fast-moving blaze further into northern Florida and toward the tiny town of Fargo west of the Okefenokee Swamp. Officials said the wildfire, ignited Saturday by lightning, had grown so rapidly that after six days it already rivaled a fire that has scorched 116,480 acres, or 182 square miles, of southeastern Georgia forest and swampland since April 16 - the state's largest wildfire on record. About 570 homes in northern Columbia County, Fla., were evacuated overnight, and heavy smoke blanketed the area. A haze was seen in Miami, more than 300 miles away. To the north, a wildfire grew to nearly 86 square miles in northeastern Minnesota and across the border into Canada, cutting power and phone lines to many resorts and lake homes. The fire, driven by high wind Thursday and fed by drought-parched forest, has already destroyed 45 structures and was threatening about 200 more. The chance of desperately needed rainfall was still days away. Associated Press writers Daisy Nguyen and Christina Almeida in Los Angeles, and Gillian Flaccus in Long Beach contributed to this report.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/M/MISSOURI_FLOODING?SITE=NJMOR&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Daily Record - Nation & World Subscribe to our Daily Report newsletter May 11, 6:56 PM EDT More Mo. Flooding; Parts of River Crest Farmer: Flood 'Very Financially Strapping' More Mo. Flooding; Parts of River Crest Evacuations, Sandbagging in Missouri Mo. (AP) -- Levee breaks along the Missouri River flooded homes, farms, highways and railroad tracks as floodwaters that have inundated the region were expected to peak in some spots this weekend. Near-record flood levels dropped in some places but rose in northwest and central Missouri, as worried residents removed valuables from their homes and filled sandbags to protect river communities. A barge that floated loose in Glasgow was captured by the state water patrol about 60 road miles downstream near Hartsburg, officials said. The water patrol planned to tie it up until the waters recede, Highway Patrol Capt. Tim Hull said. Along the Mississippi River, surging water and debris threatened to knock loose a docked, four-story pleasure barge and slam it into a bridge. Three of the four chains holding it in place broke, but U.S. Coast Guard crews and a private tug boat company were able to secure it. Inmates from St. Joseph prison and National Guard members filled sandbags to try to protect a water treatment plant, schools and an ethanol plant near Craig, where the Missouri River dropped a few inches Thursday. The water got within "a hillbilly's whisker from going over in several places," Holt County Sheriff Kirby Felumb said. Rivers breached or topped dozens of levees across the state, officials said. No serious injuries or deaths had been reported in the flooding, said Brian Hauswirth, a spokesman for the State Emergency Management Agency. The storms that raised river levels also generated the tornadoes that killed 12 people in Kansas last weekend. Although the river crests were lower than forecast in many areas, residents remained anxious. Many were here for the 1993 floods, among the most costly in U.S. history. At the State Emergency Operations Center, Gov. Matt Blunt said damage assessment teams were being dispatched to 17 counties, and about 100 Missouri National Guard members had been deployed. He said the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers has prepared about 1.2 million sandbags. "We were fortunate that a majority of counties made a lot of improvements since '93," National Guard Col. Glenn Hagler said. The rain-swollen rivers and streams that make up the Missouri River system are causing damage as the water flows east toward St. Louis, where the Missouri River meets the Mississippi, said Suzanne Fortin, a meteorologist with the National Weather Service. In Jefferson City, the Missouri River was expected to crest Sunday at 8.7 feet above flood stage, which could cause flooding at the airport and other low-lying areas below the bluff where the state Capitol sits. Officials in Chariton County, which includes Brunswick, said the Grand River was expected to crest Friday afternoon and the levees should hold. People were sandbagging some low-lying spots. Some basements had water in them, but no serious damage or injuries were reported. Also Friday, farmers in Wooldridge, a tiny town about 15 miles west of Columbia, contested plans by the Department of Conversation to let a small amount of water into a wetland habitat. Levees had cut the area off from the Missouri River, said wildlife regional supervisor Mike Schroer. But town residents objected and stopped water from entering the pipe about 15 minutes after it was opened, and the agency said it had no plans to try again. John Clay, whose farm is protected by the levee, said two area residents were standing guard to prevent state officials from reopening it. "This could not be acceptable, and there can be no good reason to do this at this point in time with the river flooding," he said. Associated Press writer Heather Hollingsworth in Kansas City and Jim Salter in St. Louis, Mo., contributed to this report.
http://apdigitalnews.com/privacy.html AP Digital | Terms of Use
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/B/BRIDGE_CRASH_FATALS?SITE=NJMOR&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Daily Record - Nation & World Subscribe to our Daily Report newsletter May 11, 9:45 AM EDT 3 Dead in Crash on Chesapeake Bay Bridge Md. (AP) -- A runaway trailer started a chain-reaction crash on the Chesapeake Bay bridge, killing three people and injuring five others as dozens of vehicles swerved to avoid it, authorities said. As crumpled trucks were hauled away Thursday evening, structural engineers examined the bridge by boat, air and foot and it was found to be structurally sound and safe, said Marcus Brown, chief of the Maryland Transportation Authority Police. Friday morning, all lanes were open again. The bridge, officially known as the William Preston Lane Jr. Memorial Bridge, is the main artery connecting Maryland's Eastern Shore with the rest of the state. With the westbound lanes closed all night, stores on the eastern side were busy. "They can't get across the bridge to go home so they're just hanging out until the bridge opens up. It's good for business, but it's not good for me here all alone," said Melodie Shreve, who was working by herself at the Shore Stop in Stevensville. The Best Western in Grasonville, a few miles from the bridge, sold out by 8 p.m. Melissa Hess, the front desk supervisor, said some guests who had suites even gave up their second room to help stranded motorists. The crash started when a small flatbed trailer being pulled by an SUV came unattached shortly after 4 p.m. at the start of the bridge's westbound span. In all, seven vehicles crashed, including a tanker hauling animal fat and a tow truck. "Other vehicles that were following swerved to avoid a trailer and that's what started this collision," said police Cpl. Jonathan Green. He described it as an "unbelievable crash scene" with vehicles pinned against each other and the railings, but said none went off the bridge. Brown said it was too early in the investigation to say whether charges would be filed. One person was flown to the University of Maryland Shock Trauma Center with life-threatening injuries; four others had less serious injuries, Brown said.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/B/BABY_NAMES_KATRINA?SITE=NJMOR&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Daily Record - Nation & World Subscribe to our Daily Report newsletter May 11, 4:56 PM EDT Katrina Dips in Popularity As Baby Name sent regarding the defective levee pumps Day at the Depot: Store Becomes Community Hub AP Analysis: Katrina Insurance Katrina Insurance: The Survivors Letter from U.S. Sen. Vitter Expressing Concern Over Levee Pumps (04/13/2007) WASHINGTON (AP) -- As baby names go, Katrina isn't in vogue these days. But she hasn't disappeared either. From its peak in the 1980s - when it regularly ranked among the 100 most popular names that parents chose for their daughters - it had gradually slumped to 247th by 2005, even before Hurricane Katrina smashed the Gulf Coast in late summer of that year. The name's association with the catastrophe has now knocked it out of consideration for most parents, sinking its popularity to the lowest ebb since the 1950s. Only about 850 baby girls in the United States were named Katrina last year, according to new data released Friday by the Social Security Administration, dropping it more than 100 slots on the popularity list. At a rank of 382nd, it now sits just below Brenna. Ironically, the two states that suffered most of Katrina's wrath bucked the trend, if only in small numbers. In Louisiana, the number of babies named Katrina jumped from eight in the 12 months before the storm to 15 in the 12 months after, according to state health officials. In Mississippi, seven babies were given the name from 2004 until the storm hit in August 2005, according to state data. The number climbed to 24 from September 2005 through the end of 2006. Overall, the country's most popular names list hasn't changed much since 2005. Emily and Jacob remain atop the list. Emily has been the top girls' name since 1996; Jacob for boys since 1999. The national trend surprised Cleveland Evans, a psychology professor and names expert at Bellevue University in Nebraska. But he said Katrina isn't likely to go extinct. "This is not going to be a name like Adolf that's going to disappear and be unusable ever again," he said, referring to that name's association with Adolf Hitler. Scarlett and Stephen Billis, a Los Angeles-area couple, named their daughter Katrina last May. Scarlett said the couple was reluctant to use the name less than a year after the hurricane, but her husband had always liked it as a variation of Katherine, a family name. Also, their family is Greek and the name is close to the popular Greek name Katerina. "People ask if we named her after the hurricane," Billis said. "We didn't pick it because of that and we were actually hesitant ... but we do joke that our house looks like a hurricane hit." The Social Security Administration's rankings, released each year just before Mother's Day, are based on some 4.2 million Social Security card applications from 2006. Social Security began compiling the name lists in 1997. The agency offers lists of baby names for each year since 1880 on its Web site:
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/J/JAMESTOWN_ANNIVERSARY?SITE=KLIF&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Sign-Up & Login Page Ed Wallace - "Wheels" The Dallas Morning News The New York Times The Chicago Sun Times The San Francisco Chronicle The Los Angeles Times The Wall Street Journal Real Change - Skeleton Closet People for the American Way May 11, 4:59 PM EDT Va. Marks Jamestown Settlement Bring Jamestown History to Life JAMESTOWN, Va. (AP) -- History lovers lined up Friday to buy a postage stamp recognizing Jamestown as America's first permanent English settlement, one of several weekend events marking the site's 400th anniversary. The commemoration will also include concerts, fireworks and a Sunday appearance by President Bush. More than 100 white tents and several stages were set up around the Jamestown venues, giving them the feel of a county fair. Cultural anthropologist Judith Scott, who's been collecting stamps since was 8, waited more than an hour to buy the new Jamestown issue. The 41-cent stamp's triangular shape represents the settlers' original three-sided fort and their three ships. With her purchases tucked inside a commemorative tote bag, she and her husband, Carl, were ready to start hitting the concert stages and exhibition tents. "We don't to miss a thing," said Scott, a Venezuela native who lives in Oakton. Activities were taking place at Historic Jamestowne, where archaeologists in the mid-1990s found the remains of the settlers' fort, which had long been thought to have been washed away in the James River; the Jamestown Settlement museum, which has replicas of the fort, the settlers' three ships and an Indian village; and at the new Anniversary Park, across from Jamestown Settlement. Virginia has been throwing major Jamestown bashes every 50 years, but they have been careful to call this year's event a "commemoration," rather than a celebration. With the arrival of the English in May 1607, native Indian tribes eventually were pushed off their lands, and slavery in America is traced to Jamestown, where the first Africans in the country arrived in 1619. This year's anniversary of the colony, which was founded as a business venture, is the first to focus on all three of those cultures. The 1957 anniversary was a largely white affair. Blacks were involved in the 1907 anniversary exposition, held an hour away in Norfolk, which included a visit by black educator and leader Booker T. Washington on "Negro Day." "In 2007, it's our year to get it right, to make sure everyone is at the table," Gov. Timothy M. Kaine said. More than half of the weekend's 90,000 tickets remained unsold as of last week. Amateur historian James Pegram of Hernando, Fla., said he planned to attend all three days. "I love this place and I think everyone in America should be here at least once," Pegram said. On Friday, Kaine was expected to join former Supreme Court Justice Sandra Day O'Connor, honorary chair of Jamestown 2007, and other dignitaries at the rededication of Historic Jamestowne. He was expected to help officially ring in the weekend with a ceremony at Anniversary Park later Friday. On Saturday, a replica of the small work boat that colonist John Smith used to explore the Chesapeake Bay and its tributaries in the early 17th Century will set sail to retrace Smith's voyage. Other highlights include a joint performance by the Virginia Symphony and Richmond Symphony orchestras to premiere works written for the commemoration and a concert headlined by Bruce Hornsby, the Williamsburg-based pianist and songwriter. Bush will participate in ceremonies on Sunday, and the weekend will conclude with the performance of a 400-piece orchestra and a 1,607-voice choir.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/M/MISSOURI_FLOODING?SITE=KLIF&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Sign-Up & Login Page Ed Wallace - "Wheels" The Dallas Morning News The New York Times The Chicago Sun Times The San Francisco Chronicle The Los Angeles Times The Wall Street Journal Real Change - Skeleton Closet People for the American Way May 11, 6:56 PM EDT More Mo. Flooding; Parts of River Crest Farmer: Flood 'Very Financially Strapping' More Mo. Flooding; Parts of River Crest Evacuations, Sandbagging in Missouri Mo. (AP) -- Levee breaks along the Missouri River flooded homes, farms, highways and railroad tracks as floodwaters that have inundated the region were expected to peak in some spots this weekend. Near-record flood levels dropped in some places but rose in northwest and central Missouri, as worried residents removed valuables from their homes and filled sandbags to protect river communities. A barge that floated loose in Glasgow was captured by the state water patrol about 60 road miles downstream near Hartsburg, officials said. The water patrol planned to tie it up until the waters recede, Highway Patrol Capt. Tim Hull said. Along the Mississippi River, surging water and debris threatened to knock loose a docked, four-story pleasure barge and slam it into a bridge. Three of the four chains holding it in place broke, but U.S. Coast Guard crews and a private tug boat company were able to secure it. Inmates from St. Joseph prison and National Guard members filled sandbags to try to protect a water treatment plant, schools and an ethanol plant near Craig, where the Missouri River dropped a few inches Thursday. The water got within "a hillbilly's whisker from going over in several places," Holt County Sheriff Kirby Felumb said. Rivers breached or topped dozens of levees across the state, officials said. No serious injuries or deaths had been reported in the flooding, said Brian Hauswirth, a spokesman for the State Emergency Management Agency. The storms that raised river levels also generated the tornadoes that killed 12 people in Kansas last weekend. Although the river crests were lower than forecast in many areas, residents remained anxious. Many were here for the 1993 floods, among the most costly in U.S. history. At the State Emergency Operations Center, Gov. Matt Blunt said damage assessment teams were being dispatched to 17 counties, and about 100 Missouri National Guard members had been deployed. He said the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers has prepared about 1.2 million sandbags. "We were fortunate that a majority of counties made a lot of improvements since '93," National Guard Col. Glenn Hagler said. The rain-swollen rivers and streams that make up the Missouri River system are causing damage as the water flows east toward St. Louis, where the Missouri River meets the Mississippi, said Suzanne Fortin, a meteorologist with the National Weather Service. In Jefferson City, the Missouri River was expected to crest Sunday at 8.7 feet above flood stage, which could cause flooding at the airport and other low-lying areas below the bluff where the state Capitol sits. Officials in Chariton County, which includes Brunswick, said the Grand River was expected to crest Friday afternoon and the levees should hold. People were sandbagging some low-lying spots. Some basements had water in them, but no serious damage or injuries were reported. Also Friday, farmers in Wooldridge, a tiny town about 15 miles west of Columbia, contested plans by the Department of Conversation to let a small amount of water into a wetland habitat. Levees had cut the area off from the Missouri River, said wildlife regional supervisor Mike Schroer. But town residents objected and stopped water from entering the pipe about 15 minutes after it was opened, and the agency said it had no plans to try again. John Clay, whose farm is protected by the levee, said two area residents were standing guard to prevent state officials from reopening it. "This could not be acceptable, and there can be no good reason to do this at this point in time with the river flooding," he said. Associated Press writer Heather Hollingsworth in Kansas City and Jim Salter in St. Louis, Mo., contributed to this report.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/C/CRINGE_READINGS?SITE=KLIF&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Sign-Up & Login Page Ed Wallace - "Wheels" The Dallas Morning News The New York Times The Chicago Sun Times The San Francisco Chronicle The Los Angeles Times The Wall Street Journal Real Change - Skeleton Closet People for the American Way May 11, 4:19 PM EDT Diary Readings: Teen Angst Flashback Polls & Test Scores AP Education Reporter Ben Feller Math and Reading Scores by State Md. School Evacuated Over Odd Bottle Security Tighter for Colo. Graduation New Orleans' State-Run Schools Score Low Kan. Spikes Conservative Sex Ed Policies 2 School Buses Crash in N.J. YORK (AP) -- The year was 1987, the boy's name was Rob, and 13-year-old Ingrid Wiese had some pressing concerns. "He kisses weird," she wrote in her diary. "I just hope it doesn't stick and I don't end up kissing like that forever." Twenty years later, Wiese hauled the diary out of storage and read it to a bar full of strangers just for laughs. "Cringe" readings, these exercises are called, and they are growing in popularity around the country. In other cities, they have names such as "Mortified" and "Salon of Shame." Groups in New York and elsewhere convene to relive what most would rather forget: the depths of their teenage angst. Participants get up on stage with their ragged, old diaries and are instructed to read only material embarrassing enough to make them cringe. It turns out that embarrassing is also funny. When Wiese appeared at the reading, held monthly at a Brooklyn bar, the room was packed beyond capacity. The 33-year-old fundraiser may have been cringing, but her audience was cheering. "When most people hear about it they think, `Oh God, that would be just absolutely humiliating, I would never do that,'" said Blaise Kearsley, another reader. "But I think there's something so universal about your adolescent diaries and your poems and your school assignments. It's just stuff that everyone can relate to." Indeed, as readers spoke about zits and boys, sex and death, they heard plenty of knowing laughter. Perhaps only teenagers or former teenagers could follow this diary entry, written by a 14-year-old Kearsley in 1987: "When we got to the dance, Erin was depressed because she likes John and he spent the whole night dancing with Ada. But Ada was upset because at the end of the dance John frenched her. And number one: she likes him but she doesn't know if she likes him in THAT WAY. And number two: John is good friends with Dan, her ex, and she knows that Dan will have something to say to John about this." The Brooklyn event was started by a local administrative assistant, Sarah Brown, who in a momentary, drunken lapse started reading her old diaries to friends - and discovered they had finally become more funny than painful. The monthly cringe reading has since landed Brown a book deal and a pilot for cable television's TLC, allowing the 29-year-old to quit her day job. Similar events are happening around the country in Los Angeles, San Francisco, Chicago, Milwaukee and Seattle. "When you're a teenager, everything is the same level of intensity," Brown said. "They read about boys, or girls, or their parents, or their friends, or school, or something serious like, you know, a divorce - but ... there's no change of tone." While the readers try to keep it light, plenty of the material in their diaries is dark, heart-wrenching stuff. "Why? Why do you think someone could really love you?" a now-grown Ingrid Wiese reads to the crowd. "You're fat, out of shape, covered with zits. You can just feel how your body is GOING. Your arms, your wrists, your calves. You're insecure, immature, and" - she lowers her voice to a whisper - "your grades reflect your intelligence." The 33-year-old Wiese says it's enough to make her wish she could somehow give that insecure girl a hug. "I just want to go back and tell that kid so many things, but mostly that `you're just all right the way you are,'" Wiese said after the reading. These days, Wiese's emotions are less heightened, and she carries herself confidently as she walks from the stage. Still, some things never change. "Of course!" she says when asked if she still obsesses over boys. "And I write all about it on my blog."
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/S/SUSPICIOUS_DEVICES?SITE=KLIF&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Sign-Up & Login Page Ed Wallace - "Wheels" The Dallas Morning News The New York Times The Chicago Sun Times The San Francisco Chronicle The Los Angeles Times The Wall Street Journal Real Change - Skeleton Closet People for the American Way May 11, 4:28 PM EDT Men Apologize for Boston Cartoon Stunt Guerrilla Marketing Goes Awry BOSTON (AP) -- Prosecutors said they would not pursue charges against two men who planted electronic devices around the city as part of a botched advertising campaign after the pair apologized Friday for causing a bomb scare. Peter Berdovsky, 27, and Sean Stevens, 28, also performed community service at a rehabilitation center in a deal with prosecutors. In contrast to their first court appearance in January, when they mugged for the camera and waved to friends in the courtroom, the men offered contrite apologies and said they never expected the stunt to cause any turmoil. "I deeply regret that this incident caused such anguish and disruption to so many people," Berdovsky told the Charlestown District Court. Stevens said he saw the devices simply as "harmless entertainment." "I had no intention of upsetting or alarming anyone," he said. The two were accused of planting about three dozen battery-powered devices in Boston and Cambridge on Jan. 31. The devices, a promotion for Cartoon Network, had lights that created images of a cartoon character making an obscene gesture. Fears of terrorism arose when the devices were discovered in a subway station and on a bridge, among other locations. Bomb squads were deployed, and highways, bridges and some transit stations were temporarily closed. Similar signs were placed in nine other cities around the United States, but only in Boston did they elicit such a response. Berdovsky and Stevens were charged with placing a hoax device and disorderly conduct. Attorney General Martha Coakley said it would have been difficult to prove to a jury that the men intended to create panic, and that she did not believe they realized the problems the ads would cause. "We believe this was an appropriate and fair resolution," Coakley said. Berdovsky said he was relieved the case was resolved without a trial. "I am looking forward to what the future has to bring. I'm just going to be working really hard and working on my art and working to build a really peaceful community for all of us to live in," Berdovsky told The Associated Press by telephone after the hearing. Berdovsky performed 80 hours of service and Stevens completed 60 hours at the Spaulding Rehabilitation Center in Boston. The men designed a cartoon mural that will be painted in a waiting area for children undergoing physical therapy, said Oz Mondejar, Spaulding's vice president of human resources. They also helped patients use computers, cleaned the hospital's sailing docks and helped produce a DVD featuring patients talking about their rehabilitation successes. Turner Broadcasting and the advertising agency that carried out the campaign, Interference Inc., agreed to pay a $2 million settlement to cover costs and restitution for the law enforcement response. The head of the Cartoon Network resigned nine days after the stunt.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/V/VIRGINIA_TECH_GRADUATION?SITE=KLIF&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Sign-Up & Login Page Ed Wallace - "Wheels" The Dallas Morning News The New York Times The Chicago Sun Times The San Francisco Chronicle The Los Angeles Times The Wall Street Journal Real Change - Skeleton Closet People for the American Way May 11, 6:16 PM EDT Va. Tech Graduations Honor Slain Victims Virginia Tech Prepares for Commencement Dan O'Neil Memorial Concert Tech Shooting Coverage Students Return to Classes Slain Singer Honored With Concert Virginia Tech: A Self-Portrait Portraits of the Victims Timeline of Seung-Hui Cho's Life The Victims: A Family Mourns The Victims: Holocaust Survivor Saves Students Memorials: Field of Grief Search Warrants for Cho's Computer, Phone and Medical Records (ABC News) Cho's Mental Health Records Objects Seized from Cho's Room Va. Tech Graduations Honor Slain Victims Va. Tech Review Panel Holds 1st Meeting Gen. Abizaid to Give Va. Tech Speech URL Buyers Hope to Cash in on Tragedy Va. Tech Seniors Prepare for Transition Va. Tech to Honor Victims at Graduation Cho Didn't Get Court-Ordered Treatment Bomb Warning Found Before Tech Shooting Opinions Vary on Fate of Va. Tech Hall Va. Tech Fields Merchandise Requests BLACKSBURG, Va. (AP) -- Thousands of Virginia Tech graduates struggled to balance joy with grief as commencement ceremonies got under way Friday, less than a month after a student gunman's rampage devastated the campus. In an address to about 600 of the nearly 1,200 graduate students who received master's degrees, President Charles Steger spoke to the community's grief while encouraging the graduates to be proud of their accomplishments and hopeful for their futures. "Our hearts are saddened and our minds are troubled," Steger said. A larger ceremony for some 3,600 graduating seniors was set for Friday evening, where the school planned to issue class rings to relatives of the 26 slain students, followed by diplomas in smaller ceremonies Saturday. "Short was their stay on this mortal stage. Great was their impact," Steger said of the slain students. Gunman Seung-Hui Cho also killed five faculty members and himself. His family will not receive a ring or diploma. During the graduate ceremonies, nine slain graduate students were awarded posthumous master's degrees or doctorates. Faculty members hugged the relatives who received them, some wiping away tears and all drawing long and loud applause from the crowd of several thousand. Graduate Scott Cassell, 55, of Roanoke, hadn't planned to attend the commencement ceremonies. But after the attacks, the father of five decided he would go as a show of support for the grieving families. "I just can't fathom the loss," said Cassell, who received a master's degree in information technology. Security employees checked the bags of guests, armed police officers patrolled the grounds and state troopers stood guard at every entrance. Guests did not have to pass through metal detectors, though, and school officials said the level of security was comparable to what they would see at a home football game. James Long, whose sister, Michelle, earned a degree in history, said students would not let the tragedy overshadow their celebration. "There are too many people here to celebrate five, six years of hard work to let one guy screw that up," said Long, 25, of Richmond. Some families couldn't bear to attend graduation. Others said they had no choice but to come. "We have to. This is right for us," said Peter Read, whose freshman daughter Mary Karen Read was among those killed. Peter and Cathy Read returned to campus for more than their daughter's degree. They also returned to erase an unsettling image from the minds of their two youngest sons, Patrick, 4, and Brendan, 2. "They're a little concerned that the bad man's going to shoot them," Cathy Read said. "We can't let that idea grow in their heads." In Washington, President Bush issued a statement praising "the compassion and resilient spirit" of the Virginia Tech community and the 3,600 graduating seniors and others earning advanced or associate degrees. "Laura and I salute the Virginia Tech Class of 2007. We also remember the students and teachers whose lives were taken last month," he said. "They will always hold a special place in the hearts of this graduating class and an entire nation." Twins Andrea and Michelle Falletti of Chantilly, Va., said the shootings will not be what they remember when they look back on four years of college. Rather, they will recall spring breaks, camping trips and partying with friends. "Obviously, what has happened has affected everything in our lives, and it will affect graduation," said Andrea Falletti, 21. "In a way, it's not going to be celebrating us as much; it's more about what we've done as a community. But that's OK. I'm proud of what we've done here." Associated Press writers Sue Lindsey and Vicki Smith contributed to this report.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/F/FORT_DIX_PLOT?SITE=KLIF&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Sign-Up & Login Page Ed Wallace - "Wheels" The Dallas Morning News The New York Times The Chicago Sun Times The San Francisco Chronicle The Los Angeles Times The Wall Street Journal Real Change - Skeleton Closet People for the American Way May 11, 4:21 PM EDT Fort Dix Suspects All Are Denied Bail complaint against Eljvir Duka in Fort Dix plot case Hearing Transcript: Waleed Mohammed bin Attash Hearing Transcript: Khalid Sheikh Mohammed Hearing Transcript Abu Faraj al-Libi Hearing Transcript: Ramzi Binalshibh Declassified Report: Iraq 'Cause Celebre' for Extremists U.S. Pushing Europe for Flight Data Deal Bush's Privacy Board Not Doing Its Job? British Police Make 4 Terror Arrests Doctor in Terror Trial Defends Himself Dix Plot Shows Homegrown Radical Threat CAMDEN, N.J. (AP) -- Six Muslim men suspected of plotting to massacre U.S. soldiers at Fort Dix were ordered held without bail Friday. Prosecutors argued that the men, all born outside the United States, pose a flight risk. They are being held at a federal detention center in Philadelphia. The men were arrested Monday during what the FBI said was an attempt to buy AK-47 machine guns, M-16s and other weapons. They targeted Fort Dix, a post 25 miles east of Philadelphia that is used primarily to train reservists, partly because one of them had delivered pizzas there and was familiar with the base, according to court filings. Their objective was to kill "as many American soldiers as possible," the documents said. The men have lived in and around Philadelphia for years, worshipped at moderate mosques and worked blue-collar jobs installing roofs, driving a cab, delivering pizzas and baking bread. Four are ethnic Albanians from the former Yugoslavia, one is from Jordan and one is from Turkey. As they were led into the courtroom, each of the suspects smiled to relatives and friends, many of whom wept and blew kisses to them. Only one of the men, Mohamad Ibrahim Shnewer, 22, asked to be released on bail, and friends and relatives offered to post properties they owned as collateral. Assistant U.S. Attorney Stephen Stigall argued against letting Shnewer be released to the custody of his parents while awaiting trial. He said many of the illegal actions that the government alleges Shnewer committed happened or were planned at his parents' house. Defense lawyers for some of the men said they are considering attacking the prosecution's reliance on two paid informants who infiltrated the group more than a year ago and recorded conversations with the defendants. Authorities said they first learned about the men in January 2006 after a tip from a clerk at a Mount Laurel electronics store. Circuit City spokeswoman Jackie Foreman said Friday that credit for the tip is shared by two employees. She declined to name them but said the company has "communicated its appreciation." She declined to give details. The pair called police because a home video the men wanted transferred to a DVD looked like it might have terrorist links, U.S. Attorney Christopher J. Christie said. Earlier this year, authorities said, the men took a training trip to the Pocono Mountains in Pennsylvania, where they fired weapons and played paintball to prepare for an attack. Five of the men - Shnewer; Serdar Tatar, 23; Dritan "Anthony" or "Tony" Duka, 28; Shain Duka, 26; and Eljvir "Elvis" Duka, 23 - are charged with conspiring to kill uniformed military personnel, an offense punishable by life in prison. Agron Abdullahu, 24, is charged with helping illegal immigrants obtain weapons. He could face 10 years in prison if convicted. Abdullahu, who faces the least serious charges of the six, will have another bail hearing next Thursday.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/M/MUTILATED_INFANT?SITE=KLIF&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Sign-Up & Login Page Ed Wallace - "Wheels" The Dallas Morning News The New York Times The Chicago Sun Times The San Francisco Chronicle The Los Angeles Times The Wall Street Journal Real Change - Skeleton Closet People for the American Way May 11, 6:13 PM EDT Texas Mother Accused of Mutilating Baby By JUAN A. LOZANO (AP) -- A mother who claimed the family dog tore off her baby son's genitals was arrested Friday and accused of mutilating the boy herself with a sharp instrument. Katherine Nadal, 25, was led away in handcuffs while awaiting a court hearing on custody of the 3-month-old boy, Holden Gothia. She was charged with injury to a child and held on $100,000 bail. Child-welfare authorities said she told social workers she woke up from a nap March 13 to find that her small dachshund had attacked her son. But a veterinarian and a doctor agreed the dog did not cause the injuries, because there was no blood or human tissue on the animal or in its mouth, police said. Police said in court papers that the mother had used a sharp instrument to cut off the boy's genitals. The instrument was not identified. Nadal's attorney had no comment. Nadal had a history of prescription drug abuse and tested positive for cocaine and methadone the day after Holden was mutilated, authorities said. She has been forbidden to see her son since the injuries occurred in March. "Given what we know today, we will probably work toward terminating her parental rights and reuniting the child with his father or another relative," said Harris County Child Protective Services spokeswoman Estella Olguin. The baby has years of reconstructive surgery and other operations ahead of him, said Daniel Sanders, an attorney for Camden Gothia, the baby's father. The dog has since been released by authorities and adopted.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WILDFIRES?SITE=KLIF&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Sign-Up & Login Page Ed Wallace - "Wheels" The Dallas Morning News The New York Times The Chicago Sun Times The San Francisco Chronicle The Los Angeles Times The Wall Street Journal Real Change - Skeleton Closet People for the American Way May 11, 6:31 PM EDT Calif. Island Survives Wildfire Scare Schwarzenegger Reacts to SoCal Wildfires Photos: Wildfires Across the U.S. Photos: Wildfire Burns in California Charges Against Crew Boss Calif. Island Survives Wildfire Scare 2 Kids Charged in Ga. Wildfires Ga. Wildfire Called 'A Long-Term Battle' Calif. (AP) -- Water-dumping planes and helicopters helped beat back soaring flames that threatened this quaint Catalina Island town Friday, giving firefighters a victory that allowed nearly 4,000 evacuated residents to start coming home. Even though the six-square-mile blaze was only 10 percent contained, the wildfire and thick smoke was confined to the tinder-dry brush in the mountains of this narrow island 30 miles off Los Angeles. Avalon's cobblestone streets, brightly painted bungalows, landmark casino and tourist hotels were mostly spared, with only one home and several outbuildings burned. No one was seriously injured. "Thank goodness the firefighters did get here because that made the difference," said Martha Ashleigh, 61, who has lived on Catalina on and off for years. "We were watching from our balcony and we could just see truck after truck go up there. They were just fabulous." A day earlier, flames bore down from the mountains, raining ash and chaos on the crescent harbor. Evacuated residents clambered onto ferries that passed U.S. Navy hovercrafts packed with fire trucks from the mainland. Many were workers who cook and clean for vacationers. Others were at vacation homes as the summer tourist season geared up. "It's like a war zone. The skies turned completely gray with orange streaks. The helicopters were flying all over the place," said Anita Bussing, a therapist whose other home is in Long Beach. "People were freaking out, children were crying." By Friday afternoon, one ferry full of residents was headed back to the island on from Long Beach, and a relay of water-carrying helicopters saturated a hillside at the edge of town where smoke curled into the blue sky. The step appeared intended to extinguish any lingering hot spots. The cause of the fire, which erupted Thursday afternoon in the 76-square-mile island's rugged interior, had not yet been determined. The island's relative isolation has proven a liability before. A 1915 fire that started in a hotel burned half the town's buildings. The island's romantic vibe was memorialized in the 1958 hit "26 Miles (Santa Catalina)." Before private jets and third homes became standard fare for the rich and really famous, Santa Catalina was a celebrity haunt for the likes of Theodore Roosevelt, Winston Churchill and Cecil B. DeMille. About 300 movies have been shot on the island or in nearby waters, including "Mutiny on the Bounty," "Chinatown," "Jaws" and "Apollo 13." One relic of that era are the herds of bison that were brought over for filming and later released. Environmentalists said it was too early to tell how the blaze affected the island's overall ecosystem, home to rare animal and plant life, including the Catalina Island fox. But four bald eaglets that hatched earlier this year without human help were unharmed, according to Bob Rhein, a spokesman for the Catalina Island Conservancy which owns most of the island. The eagles were wiped out decades ago by chemical contamination. Just days before and about 50 miles away on the mainland, crews beat back flames in Los Angeles' major park that singed a neighborhood of multimillion-dollar homes. That was the third menacing fire in the Hollywood Hills this spring - and wildfire season here isn't supposed to heat up until the fall. Around the country, firefighters battled a wildfire in Georgia and northern Florida that burned 179,940 acres - or 281 square miles - since a lightning strike ignited it a week ago. The fire, which started last Saturday in the middle of the Okefenokee National Wildlife Refuge, took just six days to grow larger than a wildfire that has burned 116,480 acres of Georgia forest and swampland over more than three weeks. In Georgia, the fire posed a potential threat to the tiny city of Fargo, where 380 people live about eight miles west of the Okefenokee Swamp. No evacuations had been ordered Friday. About 570 homes in northern Columbia County, Fla., were evacuated overnight, and heavy smoke blanketed the area. A haze was seen in Miami, more than 300 miles away. To the north, a wildfire grew to nearly 86 square miles in northeastern Minnesota and across the border into Canada, cutting power and phone lines to many resorts and lake homes. The fire, driven by high wind Thursday and fed by drought-parched forest, has already destroyed 45 structures and was threatening about 200 more. The chance of desperately needed rainfall was still days away. Associated Press writers Jeff Wilson and Robert Jablon in Los Angeles, Peter Prengaman in Long Beach and Andrew Glazer in Avalon contributed to this report.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/A/AIRCRAFT_CRASH?SITE=KLIF&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Sign-Up & Login Page Ed Wallace - "Wheels" The Dallas Morning News The New York Times The Chicago Sun Times The San Francisco Chronicle The Los Angeles Times The Wall Street Journal Real Change - Skeleton Closet People for the American Way May 11, 5:29 PM EDT 2 Dead in Ohio Aircraft Collision Ohio (AP) -- Two small aircraft collided Friday over suburban Cincinnati, raining debris onto roads and backyards and killing two people on board, authorities said. The accident evidently involved two planes, the Federal Aviation Administration said in a recorded message. The agency initially said one of the aircraft might have been a helicopter. Witnesses gave conflicting accounts of the types of aircraft involved. The FAA had no information about the aircrafts' flight plans or why they were so close together. Blue Ash Airport, a runway used by small planes, is several miles away. No injuries were reported on the ground. Several roads were closed because of the debris. The planes' pilots were not required to file flight plans and apparently were not in contact with air traffic controllers, the FAA said. Resident Joe Muenks said wreckage from one of the planes fell in a yard about three blocks from his house. "It took out about a third of a tree," Muenks said. "The plane nose-dived ... The metal was so crunched together we could just see there was no way anyone who was in there could have survived." What remained of the other plane landed in a street less than a mile away, blocking the two-lane road with some debris ending up in a front yard. The aircraft narrowly missed a busy interstate, coming down on either side of it.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/V/VIRGINIA_TECH_GRADUATION?SITE=WHIZ&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Zanesville - whiznews.com - Southeastern Ohio's Resource May 12, 9:32 AM EDT Va. Tech graduations honor slain victims Virginia Tech Prepares for Commencement Dan O'Neil Memorial Concert Tech Shooting Coverage Students Return to Classes Slain Singer Honored With Concert Virginia Tech: A Self-Portrait Portraits of the Victims Timeline of Seung-Hui Cho's Life The Victims: A Family Mourns The Victims: Holocaust Survivor Saves Students Memorials: Field of Grief Search Warrants for Cho's Computer, Phone and Medical Records (ABC News) Cho's Mental Health Records Objects Seized from Cho's Room Va. Tech graduations honor slain victims Va. Tech review panel holds 1st meeting Gen. Abizaid to give Va. Tech speech URL buyers hope to cash in on tragedy Va. Tech seniors prepare for transition Va. Tech to honor victims at graduation Cho didn't get court-ordered treatment Bomb warning found before Tech shooting Opinions vary on fate of Va. Tech hall Va. Tech fields merchandise requests BLACKSBURG, Va. (AP) -- Their lives, so filled with promise, were cut short on that April day. Their families, so filled with the hope of bright futures for their loved ones, will never know what they might have accomplished. But at Friday's graduation ceremony, the 32 Virginia Tech students and faculty killed in the April 16 massacre seemed to have achieved so much, forever bonding a community and serving as a reminder that life is precious. "In the words of Dr. Martin Luther King, 'They entered the stage of history just a few years ago, and in the brief years that they were privileged to act on this mortal stage, they played their parts exceedingly well,'" Virginia Tech President Charles Steger told 3,600 graduating seniors and a crowd of nearly 30,000 friends and family. They loved horseback riding and tennis. They were musicians and dancers. They were kind and compassionate, talented and unique, Steger said. They were Hokies. Those killed were remembered throughout the ceremony in emotional speeches, their faces pictured on a huge screen at Lane Stadium. Class rings were handed out to the families of many of the slain students. Diplomas were to follow in smaller ceremonies Saturday. Less than a month ago, gunman Seung-Hui Cho wrought devastation on this campus with a hail of bullets. While Steger acknowledged the emotional wounds may never heal, he urged the graduates to move forward and celebrate life. "Please know that moving on - moving on is not the same as forgetting," he said. "We shall not forget. Yet, one senseless burst of violence - as horrible and hurtful as it is - will not turn us from our essence." As images of the slain students and faculty flashed on the stadium's screen, Steger and Provost Mark McNamee handed out the rings and received hugs in return. Cho's family will receive neither a ring nor a diploma. He killed himself as police closed in. At a ceremony Saturday morning for the engineering school, in which 11 students and three professors were slain, Dean Richard Benson was overwhelmed with emotion. "Forgive me," Benson said quietly, his voice breaking, as he paused to collect himself after speaking about Professor Kevin Granata, who was shot in a hallway as he tried to save students. Retired Army Gen. John Abizaid, former commander of U.S. forces in Iraq, praised the graduates Friday for their quiet courage, dignity and poise in dealing with the tragedy. Survivors have a responsibility to realize the dreams and aspirations of the slain, he said. "While we are saddened by the loss of those who cannot be here today, I believe that they would want this ceremony to commemorate both the tragedy of yesterday and the promise of tomorrow," he said. "I believe that they look down on this gathering with dignified pride." Students, parents and faculty rose to their feet and cheered as Abizaid thanked Steger for "holding things together" in a time of tragedy. In many ways, the evening ceremony seemed like most commencements. Grinning students jumped up and down and waved as their faces appeared on the stadium's screen while "Pomp and Circumstance" played. Students chanted "Let's go, Hokies!" and the stadium's stands twinkled with constant camera flashes from the graduates' proud family members. They decorated their mortarboards with "VT" and "Hi Mom." But the speeches, while marked by hope, were also laced with sorrow. "Rest assured, we will define ourselves by where we have been and where we will go," class historian Jennifer Weber said. Peter and Cathy Read returned to campus for the degree of their freshman daughter, Mary Karen Read, who was among those killed. They said they also returned to erase an unsettling image from the minds of their two youngest sons, Patrick, 4, and Brendan, 2. "They're a little concerned that the bad man's going to shoot them," Cathy Read said. "We can't let that idea grow in their heads." Earlier in the day, Steger and others addressed about half of the nearly 1,200 graduate students who received master's and doctorate degrees. Nine slain graduate students were awarded posthumous degrees in that ceremony. James Long, whose sister, Michelle, earned a degree in history, said students would not let the tragedy overshadow their celebration. "There are too many people here to celebrate five, six years of hard work to let one guy screw that up," he said. Associated Press writers Sue Lindsey and Vicki Smith contributed to this report. &copy 1998-2006 WHIZNEWS.COM All rights reserved EEO Public File Report
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/B/BLUE_ANGEL_CRASH?SITE=WHIZ&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Zanesville - whiznews.com - Southeastern Ohio's Resource May 12, 8:12 AM EDT Blue Angels regroup for show after crash Slideshow: Blue Angel Jet Crashes SEYMOUR JOHNSON AIR FORCE BASE, N.C. (AP) -- After 21 years as a U.S. Navy pilot, his career boasting nearly 900 aircraft carrier landings and air combat during the first Gulf War, tragedy comes as no surprise to Cmdr. Kevin Mannix. That includes last month's fatal crash of a fellow Blue Angels pilot during a show in South Carolina. But for Blue Angels pilots, whose demeanor is a key part of the job, the tragedy offers another opportunity to perform the mission they were first given six decades ago: promote the U.S. Navy and U.S. Marines Corps to the world. "Our ability to bounce back and do our mission is the same as every other squadron in the U.S. Navy or U.S. Marine Corps," said Mannix, minutes after practicing Thursday at Seymour Johnson Air Force Base in Goldsboro, where the team on Saturday was to perform its first show since the crash April 21. "The only difference is there's a lot more visibility on us because we are in the public eye," he said. "That's our job and that's what we do. I think a lot more media was focused our way on this specific mishap." Lt. Cmdr. Kevin Davis, 32, died when his No. 6 jet went down during the final minutes of a performance at the Marine Corps Air Station Beaufort in Beaufort, S.C. The Pittsfield, Mass., native was in his first year flying in formation with the team. An investigation into the cause of the crash, the Blue Angels' first since 1999 and the 26th fatality in the team's 60-year history, could take several months, according to the Navy. The Blue Angels typically fly their F/A-18A Hornets six days a week, but they stayed on the ground for nine days after the crash, canceling scheduled performances May 5 and May 6 at Offutt Air Force Base in Nebraska. Saturday's show was to feature only five jets. Lt. Cmdr. Craig Olson, 37, of Kirkland, Wash., replaced Davis a couple of weeks ago. Olson, who flew with the Blue Angels from 2003-2005, will practice with the team for a few more weeks before flying in a show, Mannix said. Mannix, the team's lead pilot in the No. 1 jet, said there was anxiety among the pilots before they flew for the first time after the crash. "We lost a brother, a great friend, a great American, actually," Lt. Cmdr. John Allison, who flies the No. 5 jet, told reporters Thursday after practice. "But we're trying to move forward and think about flying, you know, think about our jobs." During practice, the team flew in its traditional delta formation, the triangle lineup they were in when Davis crashed. Olson practiced as one of two solo members, hitting mach speeds and performing head-on near misses with Allison. Each year, the Navy considers up to about 70 pilots for the squadron. The final six pilots train constantly between January and March at El Centro Naval Air Facility, Calif., and are stationed at Pensacola Naval Air Station in Florida. The team is scheduled to fly 66 air shows this year at 35 locations across the country. The Blue Angels fly without the traditional G-suits, which most jet pilots wear to avoid blacking out during maneuvers that exert strong gravitational forces. The suits inflate and deflate air bladders around the lower body to keep blood in the brain and heart. The air bladders can cause a pilot to bump the control stick, so the Blue Angels learn to manage the G-forces by tensing their abdominal muscles. After a fatal crash, team members said, one of the best responses is to get back into the cockpit and grace the skies with twirls, climbs, dives and near misses at around 350 mph and only inches apart. "It feels good for the team to go back and do it," Mannix said Thursday, "including myself all the way down to the maintainers to do what we do for the American public, to get out there and show them we are resilient in what we do." Wings Over Wayne Air Show: &copy 1998-2006 WHIZNEWS.COM All rights reserved EEO Public File Report
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/M/MARINES_HADITHA?SITE=WHIZ&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Zanesville - whiznews.com - Southeastern Ohio's Resource May 12, 3:41 AM EDT Haditha hearing to enter 5th day Document Against Staff Sgt. Frank D. Wuterich Interactive Look at Haditha Killings CAMP PENDLETON, Calif. (AP) -- For four days, Marines have testified in court that they saw no need to investigate a squad's 2005 killings of 24 civilians in the Iraqi town of Haditha. A Marine intelligence captain paid little heed to a flier from the Haditha town council that accused Marines of intentionally targeting civilians. A lieutenant dismissed a reporter's questions about alleged abuses, figuring they reflected bias against the Marines and President Bush. The preliminary hearing for Capt. Randy W. Stone was to continue Saturday with testimony expected from an operations officer and a major who distributed nearly $40,000 in U.S. government compensation to survivors of the attack. Stone is one of four officers charged with dereliction of duty for failing to investigate the killings. Three enlisted Marines are charged with unpremeditated murder in the biggest U.S. criminal case involving civilian deaths in the Iraq war. Capt. Jeffrey Dinsmore testified Friday that council members met with battalion commander Lt. Col. Jeffrey Chessani and company commander Capt. Lucas McConnell from the 3rd Battalion, 1st Marines on Nov. 27, 2005, eight days after a Marine squad killed 24 Iraqis including women and children in their homes after a deadly roadside bomb attack. Dinsmore said the council had circulated a flier demanding an investigation into the deaths and outlining allegations that Marines deliberately targeted civilians, but he dismissed the flier as propaganda. "The reality was then and the reality is now, you let loose Marines (in a combat environment) that are defending themselves against a hostile situation - they do not have the training nor do they have presence of mind to differentiate between civilians and insurgents," Dinsmore said. The attack occurred after a roadside bomb struck a Humvee convoy, killing one Marine and injuring two others. In the aftermath, Marines shot five Iraqis by a car and went house to house looking for insurgents, using grenades and machine guns to clear houses. Dinsmore's testimony echoed other witnesses who testified that the deaths of women and children were considered collateral damage in legitimate combat. When asked how many people in his battalion knew about the civilian deaths, Dinsmore said "it was common knowledge." He testified that regimental commanders had a "unique disinterest" in investigating the killings. The hearing is part of an Article 32 investigation, the military's equivalent to a grand jury proceeding. Maj. Thomas McCann, the investigating officer, will hear evidence and recommend whether the charges should go to trial. Marine Corps Iraq Investigations: &copy 1998-2006 WHIZNEWS.COM All rights reserved EEO Public File Report
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/C/CONGRESSMAN_BRIBERY?SITE=WHIZ&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Zanesville - whiznews.com - Southeastern Ohio's Resource May 12, 1:41 AM EDT New charges against former CIA official against contractor Kyle "Dusty" Foggo Indictment against contractor Randy Wilkes SAN DIEGO (AP) -- New charges have been filed alleging that a former top CIA official pushed a proposed $100 million government contract for his best friend in return for lavish vacations, private jet flights and a lucrative job offer. The indictment, returned Thursday, replaces charges brought in February against Kyle "Dusty" Foggo, who resigned from the spy agency a year ago, and Poway-based defense contractor Brent Wilkes. The charges grew from the bribery scandal that landed former U.S. Rep. Randy "Duke" Cunningham in prison. The pair now face 30 wide-ranging counts of fraud, conspiracy and money laundering. According to the new indictment, Foggo provided Wilkes with "sensitive, internal information related to our national security," including classified information, to help him prepare proposals for providing undercover flights for the CIA under the guise of a civil aviation company and armored vehicles for agency operations. Then, he pushed his CIA colleagues to hire Wilkes' companies without disclosing their friendship, prosecutors allege. In a June 2005 e-mail to the head of CIA air operations quoted in the indictment, Foggo offered to "use some 'EXDIR grease'" on Wilkes' behalf. Foggo was the agency's executive director at the time. Prosecutors say that in return, Wilkes offered to hire Foggo after he retired from government service. In the meantime, they say, he treated his friend to a Scottish golf trip during which they racked up a $44,000 hotel bill at the luxurious Pitcastle Estate. The initial indictment in February charged the pair with 11 counts of the same charges in connection with a $1.7 million water-supply contract Foggo allegedly helped win for one of Wilkes' companies while he was working as a logistics coordinator at a CIA supply hub overseas. Both men have pleaded not guilty to those charges. They face arraignment on the new charges Monday. Wilkes is charged in a separate indictment with conspiracy, bribery, money laundering and unlawful monetary transactions to Cunningham in return for government contracts. That indictment also was updated this week to include new charges against another defendant, Long Island mortgage banker John T. Michael, who was described as a co-conspirator in Cunningham's 2005 plea agreement. He has pleaded not guilty to one count of obstructing justice but now faces additional counts of money laundering and unlawful monetary transactions in connection with wire transfers allegedly used to pay off the mortgage on Cunningham's $2.5 million Rancho Santa Fe mansion. Calls seeking comment from attorneys for Foggo and Wilkes were not immediately returned Friday. Michael's attorney, Howard Frank, said he had not read the indictment and had no comment. The initial charges came 20 months after the FBI opened an investigation into Cunningham, who served on key House committees with oversight of government contracts. He pleaded guilty in November 2005 to taking $2.4 million in bribes from defense contractors and was sentenced to more than eight years in prison. Foggo and Wilkes played high school football together, and after graduating in 1972, they roomed together at San Diego State University, were best men at each other's weddings and named their sons after each other. Foggo, the former No. 3 official at the CIA, resigned from the spy agency after his house and office were raided by federal agents. &copy 1998-2006 WHIZNEWS.COM All rights reserved EEO Public File Report
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WILDFIRES?SITE=WHIZ&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Zanesville - whiznews.com - Southeastern Ohio's Resource May 12, 9:18 AM EDT Calif. island survives wildfire scare AP Photo/LANCE CPL RYAN L TOMLINSON Firefighters Get Upperhand on Island Blaze Photos: Wildfires Across the U.S. Photos: Wildfire Burns in California Charges Against Crew Boss Calif. island survives wildfire scare 2 kids charged in Ga. wildfires Ga. wildfire called 'a long-term battle' Calif. (AP) -- Residents have started returning to this picturesque town off the Southern California coast after firefighters and favorable weather conditions halted a wildfire's advance into Catalina Island's most populated area. The island remained quiet Friday as nearly 4,000 evacuated residents began heading back to inspect their homes and apartments and reopen businesses that largely cater to tourists. "I thought it would be a melted ball of plastic," said Jim Gilligan, who reached his workplace, Dave Zeller Construction, on a golf cart. He was pleasantly surprised to find the building still standing - especially with charred ground 30 feet from the door. Visitors were still being told to stay away. An estimated 10,000 tourists take ferries from the mainland to the island each day to lounge on the beach, play golf or take inland tours. About 700 firefighters continued to battle the blaze, which started Thursday afternoon and burned about 4,200 acres - about 6 of the island's 76 squares miles. Containment was estimated at 35 percent. They were aided by a night with temperatures in the 50s and humidity higher than 70 percent - far different from the gusty, dry conditions of the fire's first day. Avalon Fire Chief Steven Hoefs said the cause of the fire remained under investigation but it appeared to have been sparked as contractors worked on antennas at a radio station in the island's interior. Only one home and six industrial businesses burned and no one was seriously injured, giving firefighters their latest in a string of victories. About 50 miles away on the mainland, crews just days earlier beat back flames in Los Angeles' sprawling Griffith Park that singed a neighborhood of multimillion-dollar homes. That was the third menacing fire in the Hollywood Hills this spring, one of the driest rainy seasons on record. Just 2 inches have fallen on Catalina this year. Environmentalists said it was too early to tell how the blaze affected the island's ecosystem, home to rare animal and plant life, including the Catalina Island fox. But four bald eaglets that hatched earlier this year without human help were unharmed, said Bob Rhein, a spokesman for the Catalina Island Conservancy, which owns most of the island. The birds are a milestone in the reintroduction of the species, which was wiped out on the island decades ago by chemical contamination. Avalon Mayor Robert Kennedy credited the firefighting success to quick-arriving reinforcements from the mainland and training that included dry runs with military hovercraft and helicopter drops. Across the country, firefighters battled a wildfire in Georgia and northern Florida that burned 179,940 acres - or 281 square miles - since a lightning strike ignited it a week ago. The fire, which started last Saturday in the middle of the Okefenokee National Wildlife Refuge, took just six days to grow larger than a wildfire that has burned 116,480 acres of Georgia forest and swampland in more than three weeks. In Georgia, the fire posed a potential threat to the city of Fargo, where 380 people live about eight miles west of the Okefenokee Swamp. Occupants of about 15 homes in a subdivision were asked to leave as a precaution because of the smoke and ash. About 570 homes in northern Columbia County, Fla., were evacuated overnight Thursday, and heavy smoke blanketed the area. A haze was seen in Miami, more than 300 miles away. To the north, a wildfire grew to nearly 86 square miles in northeastern Minnesota and across the border into Canada, cutting power lines to many resorts and lake homes. Dozens of houses and cabins have burned, and about 300 people had checked in at an evacuation center. The fire, fed by drought-parched forest, has destroyed 134 structures, including 62 houses and cabins. Crews on Friday held the fire around most of its perimeter, and favorable weather was predicted for Saturday. Associated Press writers Jeff Wilson and Robert Jablon in Los Angeles, Peter Prengaman in Long Beach, Andrew Glazer in Avalon, Russ Bynum in Folkston, Ga., and Amy Forliti in Grand Marais, Minn., contributed to this report. &copy 1998-2006 WHIZNEWS.COM All rights reserved EEO Public File Report
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/F/FAKED_RETARDATION?SITE=WHIZ&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Zanesville - whiznews.com - Southeastern Ohio's Resource May 12, 12:11 AM EDT Prison for man who faked retardation Wash. (AP) -- A Vancouver man was sentenced Friday to 13 months in prison for pretending to be mentally retarded in order to claim disability benefits. Pete J. Costello, 28, pleaded guilty in February to conspiracy to defraud the government and to Social Security fraud. He began receiving disability benefits when he was 8. He was ordered to repay the $59,226 he has received since turning 18. Costello, who cannot read or write, dictated a letter to his public defender that was submitted to the judge before sentencing and filed in court. "I know that it was wrong to 'act like a child' in the Social Security office when that is not how I really am," the letter said. "I feel very bad about this and want to do everything I can to pay this money back." Costello's mother, Rosie Costello, 46, who also pleaded guilty, is to be sentenced Thursday for coaching her son and daughter to feign mental retardation. Authorities have not found the daughter. Pete Costello continued to fake retardation into his mid-20s - picking at his face, slouching and appearing uncommunicative in meetings with Social Security officials. The scheme came to light last year after he got a traffic ticket in Vancouver, then was videotaped acting normally when he contested the ticket in court. &copy 1998-2006 WHIZNEWS.COM All rights reserved EEO Public File Report
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/M/MISSOURI_FLOODING?SITE=WHIZ&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Zanesville - whiznews.com - Southeastern Ohio's Resource May 11, 10:59 PM EDT Some fears ease in Mo. as rivers crest Farmer: Flood 'Very Financially Strapping' Some fears ease in Mo. as rivers crest Evacuations, sandbagging in Missouri Mo. (AP) -- Levee breaks along the Missouri River swamped homes, farms, highways and railroad tracks as floodwaters that have inundated the region were expected to peak in some spots this weekend. It appeared many areas would fare much better than had been feared days earlier, however. Near-record flood levels dropped in some places but rose in northwest and central Missouri, as worried residents removed valuables from their homes and filled sandbags to protect river communities. A barge that floated loose in Glasgow was captured by the state water patrol about 60 road miles downstream near Hartsburg, officials said. The water patrol planned to tie it up until the waters recede, Highway Patrol Capt. Tim Hull said. Along the Mississippi River, surging water and debris threatened to knock loose a docked, four-story pleasure barge and slam it into a bridge. Three of the four chains holding it in place broke, but U.S. Coast Guard crews and a private tug boat company were able to secure it. Rivers breached or topped dozens of levees across the state, officials said. No serious injuries or deaths had been reported in the flooding. The storms that raised river levels also generated the tornadoes that killed 12 people in Kansas last weekend. Although the river crests were lower than forecast in many areas, residents remained anxious. Many were here for the 1993 floods, among the most costly in U.S. history. At the State Emergency Operations Center, Gov. Matt Blunt said damage assessment teams were being dispatched to 17 counties, and about 100 Missouri National Guard members had been deployed. He said the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers has prepared about 1.2 million sandbags. "We were fortunate that a majority of counties made a lot of improvements since '93," National Guard Col. Glenn Hagler said. The rain-swollen rivers and streams that make up the Missouri River system are causing damage as the water flows east toward St. Louis, where the Missouri River meets the Mississippi, said Suzanne Fortin, a meteorologist with the National Weather Service. In Jefferson City, the Missouri River was expected to crest Sunday at 8.7 feet above flood stage, which could cause flooding at the airport and other low-lying areas below the bluff where the state Capitol sits. Officials in Chariton County, which includes Brunswick, said the Grand River crested Friday and the levees held. People were sandbagging some low-lying spots. Some basements had water in them, but no serious damage or injuries were reported. Farmers in Wooldridge, a tiny town about 15 miles west of Columbia, prevented the state Department of Conservation from allowing floodwaters to pour into low-lying land owned by the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers and managed by the department. Mike Schroer, the department's wildlife regional supervisor, said the agency wanted to let in only a small amount of water into a wetland habitat. Levees had cut the area off from the Missouri River, Schroer said, and water needed to preserve the wetlands can only be let in when the river is high. He estimated that 5 acres of the 4,000-acre river bottom would have been flooded. But town residents stopped water from entering the pipe about 15 minutes after it was opened. John Clay, whose farm is protected by the levee, said two area residents were standing guard to prevent state officials from reopening it. "This could not be acceptable, and there can be no good reason to do this at this point in time with the river flooding," he said. Schroer said the state was not pursuing charges against the residents but instead hoped to hold a meeting in coming weeks so all parties know what to expect when the situation arises again. "It's just a miscommunication," he said. Associated Press writers Heather Hollingsworth in Kansas City and Jim Salter in St. Louis, Mo., contributed to this report. &copy 1998-2006 WHIZNEWS.COM All rights reserved EEO Public File Report
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/J/JAMESTOWN_ANNIVERSARY?SITE=WHIZ&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Zanesville - whiznews.com - Southeastern Ohio's Resource May 12, 3:45 AM EDT Boat to retrace voyage from Jamestown Bring Jamestown History to Life JAMESTOWN, Va. (AP) -- The debuts of a stamp and four orchestral pieces were bookends of the opening day of the commemoration for the 400th anniversary of the founding of America's first permanent English settlement. On Saturday, the festivities were to take to the water. A replica of the small boat that settler John Smith used to explore the Chesapeake Bay and its tributaries will set sail to retrace Smith's voyage. The shallop will depart from Historic Jamestowne, the site on the James River where the colonists built a triangular fort after they arrived in May 1607. Archaeologists found the fort's remains, long thought to have been washed away, in the mid-1990s. Activities during the three-day commemoration were taking place at Historic Jamestowne as well as the nearby Jamestown Settlement museum, which has a replica of the fort, and at Anniversary Park, a former campground across from the museum. "It's a special weekend, a once-in-a-lifetime thing," said Christine White, a third-grade teacher from Williamsburg who was especially interested in Jamestown because it figures in her lesson plans on early explorers. The weekend includes musical performances, demonstrations by glassblowers and other artisans, fireworks and a Sunday appearance by President Bush. On Saturday, a crew of a dozen aboard the shallop were to start a 1,500-mile trip that will inaugurate the Capt. John Smith Chesapeake National Historic Trail, the first all-water national historic trail established by the federal government. The nonprofit Sultana Projects Inc. of Chestertown, Md., crafted the 28-foot open boat. Smith launched his exploration in 1608, and the trip yielded a comprehensive map that guided English settlers for nearly a century. More than 100 white tents and several stages have been set up around the Jamestown venues, giving them the feel of a state fair. Kevin Brown, a Pamunkey Indian, stood on a stage in one tent Friday, carving a man's face into a dance totem made of plaster that he eventually will cast in bronze. The features on the face are a blend of his own and those of various family members. The nearly 6-foot pole rises from a three-sided base that recalls the settlers' fort. "It's a statement that the Indians have survived," Brown said. Events got under way Friday with history lovers standing in line for more than hour to buy a newly issued Jamestown postage stamp that is three-sided, like James Fort, and features a painting of the colonists' three ships. In the evening, the Virginia Symphony and Richmond Symphony orchestras combined for the first time to perform the world premiers of four pieces written for the commemoration, including a number called "Jamestown Hymn." Virginia has been recognizing major Jamestown anniversaries every 50 years, but organizers have been careful to call the 2007 event a "commemoration" instead of a celebration. With the arrival of the English, native Indian tribes eventually were pushed off their lands, and slavery in America is traced to Jamestown, where the first Africans in the country arrived in 1619. This year's anniversary is the first to focus on all three of those cultures. &copy 1998-2006 WHIZNEWS.COM All rights reserved EEO Public File Report
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/B/BOY_IN_KENNEL?SITE=WHIZ&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Zanesville - whiznews.com - Southeastern Ohio's Resource May 12, 3:30 AM EDT Woman gets prison for caging grandson Colo. (AP) -- A 62-year-old woman was sentenced to three years in prison for locking her grandson inside a dog kennel every night for three years while she went to work as a jail counselor. Under a plea bargain, June Candelario was also sentenced Friday to one year of probation. "I cannot imagine any society that would say it is just and fair to inflict this harm on a child that cannot protect himself," Adams County District Court Judge Harlan Bockman said. Candelario, a former state trooper, put the boy in a 4 foot by 3 foot kennel each day at 4 p.m. and let him out hours later when she returned from work, authorities said. She pleaded guilty to one felony count of conspiracy to commit child abuse that resulted in bodily harm and a misdemeanor count of child abuse. The boy was 10 when the abuse began and 13 when Candelario was arrested last May. "I felt like I was in a prison in my home," said a letter from the boy, which was read in court. "When I was in the cage, I felt scared and lonely and that I was not loved by my grandma." The boy's foster mother said the boy refused to attend sentencing because he remains afraid of Candelario. &copy 1998-2006 WHIZNEWS.COM All rights reserved EEO Public File Report
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/P/PARLOR_RAIDS?SITE=WHIZ&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Zanesville - whiznews.com - Southeastern Ohio's Resource May 12, 6:19 AM EDT 4 arrested in K.C. prostitution raids CITY, Mo. (AP) -- Federal authorities charged four people with bringing women from China to the Kansas City area for prostitution after a series of raids at businesses billed as massage parlors. The charges were brought Friday, a day after authorities say they rescued from 15 women from 12 businesses in Johnson County, Kan., mostly at strip malls. The businesses had drawn the attention of neighbors for some time, investigators said. Those charged were Ling Xu, 45, Zhong Yan Liu, 35, Cheng Tang, 21, all Chinese citizens living in Overland Park, Kan., and Hongmei Madole, 31, a native of China married to a U.S. citizen and living in Olathe, Kan. They were charged with transporting people across state lines and national borders for the purpose of prostitution. The women are not facing charges, FBI spokesman Jeff Lanza said. The defendants made an initial appearance Friday afternoon in U.S. District Court in Kansas City and asked the court to appoint attorneys. Bond for Madole was set at $50,000. U.S. Magistrate Judge Robert Larsen set a hearing for Tuesday to determine bond for the other three defendants and to decide if the case will be sent to a grand jury. A criminal complaint filed Friday alleges that the defendants brought women across national borders and state lines, including into Kansas through Missouri, for prostitution for more than a year. U.S. Attorney John F. Wood said investigators believe the massage parlors were "in fact, nothing more than a front for highly profitable and thriving prostitution organizations." He said an 18-month investigation involving local, state and federal authorities found that the women were brought from China into the United States, primarily San Francisco, Los Angeles and New York City. They then flew to Kansas City and were driven to Johnson County, Kan., Wood said. An undercover officer visited three of the businesses several times between January and May and was solicited to engage in sexual acts with women there each time, according to an affidavit filed with the criminal complaint. The affidavit says investigators also searched trash at two of the businesses and found evidence of airline flights to Kansas City from Los Angeles, Phoenix, New York City and Las Vegas. The defendants also were found to have wired a total of $83,300 to China, according to the affidavit. &copy 1998-2006 WHIZNEWS.COM All rights reserved EEO Public File Report
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/J/JERRY_FALWELL?SITE=NVREN&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Content on this page is provided directly by the Associated Press. It is not archived on the Reno Gazette-Journal site. May 15, 5:02 PM EDT Founder of the Moral Majority Rev. Jerry Falwell Dies at 73 After Collapsing at His University AP Photo/STEPHEN J. BOITANO Televangelist Rev. Jerry Falwell Dies at 73 Jerry Falwell (1933-2007) Comments on the Death of Television Evangelist Jerry Falwell Falwell Left Deep Mark on American Politics Founder of the Moral Majority Rev. Jerry Falwell Dies at 73 After Collapsing at His University Rev. Jerry Falwell Dies at 73 LYNCHBURG, Va. (AP) -- The Rev. Jerry Falwell, the folksy, small-town preacher who used the power of television to found the Moral Majority and turn the Christian right into a mighty force in American politics during the Reagan years, died Tuesday at 73. Falwell was discovered without a pulse in his office at Liberty University and pronounced dead at a hospital an hour later. Dr. Carl Moore, Falwell's physician, said he had a heart condition and presumably died of a heart rhythm abnormality. Driven into politics by the 1973 Supreme Court ruling that established the right to an abortion, Falwell founded the Moral Majority in 1979. One of the conservative lobbying group's greatest triumphs came just a year later, when Ronald Reagan was elected president. Falwell credited the Moral Majority with getting millions of conservative voters registered, aiding in Reagan's victory and giving Republicans control of the Senate. "I shudder to think where the country would be right now if the religious right had not evolved," he said when he stepped down as Moral Majority president in 1987. Fellow TV evangelist Pat Robertson, himself a one-time GOP candidate for president, declared Falwell "a tower of strength on many of the moral issues which have confronted our nation." The rise of Christian conservatism - and the Moral Majority's full-throated condemnation of homosexuality, abortion and pornography - made Falwell perhaps the most recognizable figure on the evangelical right, and one of the most controversial ones, too. Over the years, Falwell waged a landmark libel case against Hustler magazine founder Larry Flynt over a raunchy parody ad, and created a furor in 1999 when one of his publications suggested that the purse-carrying "Teletubbies" character Tinky Winky was gay. Matt Foreman, executive director of National Gay and Lesbian Task Force, extended condolences to those close to Falwell, but added: "Unfortunately, we will always remember him as a founder and leader of America's anti-gay industry, someone who exacerbated the nation's appalling response to the onslaught of the AIDS epidemic, someone who demonized and vilified us for political gain and someone who used religion to divide rather than unite our nation." The 1980s marked the religious conservative movement's high-water mark. In more recent years, Falwell had become a problematic figure for the GOP. His remarks a few days after Sept. 11, 2001, essentially blaming feminists, gays and liberals for bringing on the terrorist attacks drew a rebuke from the White House, and he apologized. Falwell's declining political star seemed apparent when he quietly led in and out of the Republican Party's 2004 national convention. Just four years earlier, he was invited to pray from the rostrum. The big, blue-eyed preacher with a booming voice started a fundamentalist church in an abandoned bottling plant in Lynchburg in 1956 with just 35 members. He built it into a religious empire that included the 22,000-member Thomas Road Baptist Church, the "Old Time Gospel Hour" carried on TV stations around the country and 7,700-student Liberty University, which Falwell founded in 1971 as Lynchburg Baptist College. From his living room, he broadcast his message of salvation and raised the donations that helped his ministry grow. "He was one of the first to come up with ways to use television to expand his ministry," said Robert Alley, a retired University of Richmond religion professor who studied and criticized Falwell's career. Falwell had once opposed mixing preaching with politics, but changed his views. The Moral Majority grew to 6.5 million members and raised $69 million as it supported conservative politicians and railed against abortion, homosexuality, pornography and bans on school prayer. Falwell became the face of the religious right, appearing on national magazine covers and on talk shows. In 1983, U.S. News & World Report named him one of 25 most influential people in America. "Dr. Falwell was a man of distinguished accomplishment who devoted his life to serving his faith and country," said Sen. John McCain, a GOP presidential contender who during the 2000 primaries referred to Falwell and Robertson as "agents of intolerance." McCain has since distanced himself from those comments. In 1984, Falwell sued Hustler for $45 million, charging that he was libeled by an liquor-ad parody that quoted him as saying he lost his virginity to his mother in an outhouse. A federal jury found the fake ad did not libel him, but awarded him $200,000 for emotional distress. The verdict was overturned in a landmark 1988 U.S. Supreme Court decision that held that even pornographic spoofs about a public figure enjoy First Amendment protection. With Falwell's high profile came frequent criticism, even from fellow ministers. The Rev. Billy Graham once rebuked him for political sermonizing on "non-moral issues." Falwell quit the Moral Majority in 1987, saying he was tired of being "a lightning rod" and wanted to devote his time to his ministry and Liberty University. But he remained outspoken and continued to draw criticism for his remarks. In 1999, he told an evangelical conference that the Antichrist was a male Jew who was probably already alive. Falwell later apologized for the remark but not for holding the belief. A month later, his National Liberty Journal warned parents that Tinky Winky, the children's TV character, was a gay role model and morally damaging to children. Falwell was re-energized after family values proved important in the 2004 presidential election. He formed the Faith and Values Coalition as the "21st Century resurrection of the Moral Majority," to seek anti-abortion judges, a constitutional amendment banning gay marriage and more conservative elected officials. In 1987, Falwell took over the PTL (Praise the Lord) ministry in South Carolina after the Rev. Jim Bakker got caught in a sex and money scandal. Falwell slid fully clothed down a theme park water slide after donors met his fundraising goal to help rescue the rival ministry. He gave it up seven months later after learning the depth of PTL's financial problems. Largely because of the sex scandals involving Bakker and fellow evangelist Jimmy Swaggart, donations to Falwell's ministry dropped from $135 million in 1986 to less than $100 million the following year. Hundreds of workers were laid off and viewers of his television show dwindled. Liberty University was $73 million in debt and on the verge of bankruptcy, and his "Old Time Gospel Hour" was $16 million in debt. By the mid-1990s, two local businessmen with long ties to Falwell began overseeing the finances and helped get companies to forgive debts or write them off. Falwell dreamed that Liberty would grow to 50,000 students and be to fundamentalist Christians what Notre Dame is to Roman Catholics and Brigham Young University is to Mormons. Falwell's father and his grandfather were militant atheists, he wrote in his autobiography. He said his father made a fortune off his businesses - including bootlegging during Prohibition. As a student, Falwell was a star athlete and a prankster who was barred from giving his high school valedictorian's speech after he was caught using counterfeit lunch tickets. He ran with a gang of juvenile delinquents before becoming a born-again Christian at 19. He turned down an offer to play professional baseball and transferred from Lynchburg College to Baptist Bible College in Springfield, Mo. "My heart was burning to serve Christ," he once said in an interview. "I knew nothing would ever be the same again." Falwell had made careful preparations for a transition of his leadership to his two sons, Jerry Falwell, Jr., now vice chancellor of Liberty University, and Jonathan Falwell, executive the pastor of Thomas Road Baptist Church. Falwell is survived by his wife, Macel, his two sons and a daughter, Jeannie Falwell Savas. Funeral arrangements were not immediately known. Former Massachusetts Gov. Mitt Romney, a Mormon whose own faith has become an issue during his run for the presidency, said Falwell "built and led a movement based on strong principles and strong faith," and "the legacy of his important work will continue through his many ministries where he put his faith into action." NEWS & EMAIL &raquo; RSS Headline Feeds &raquo; RGJ.com for your PDA Homes & All Other Rentals Use of this site signifies your agreement to the , updated June 7, 2005.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/A/ARSON_PLEAS?SITE=NVREN&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Content on this page is provided directly by the Associated Press. It is not archived on the Reno Gazette-Journal site. May 15, 10:48 AM EDT Federal Government Seeks Terrorist Label for 10 Arsonists Facing Sentencing in Oregon Ore. (AP) -- Their guilt isn't in question. The six men and four women already admitted being involved in a series of arson fires that did $40 million in damage to research facilities, a ski resort and other businesses in the West. But are they terrorists as the government says? A federal judge was set to hear arguments Tuesday on a motion by the government to add a so-called terrorism enhancement to their sentences. Prosecutors want Judge Ann Aiken to declare the group terrorists - something defense attorneys argue has never happened in 1,200 arsons nationwide claimed by Earth Liberation Front and Animal Liberation Front. The defense argues that branding their clients terrorists is more about politics than sentencing. "The Government has Attorney General Alberto Gonzales' political agenda to advance with this case, and nothing else to lose if the Court declines to impose the enhancement," wrote attorney Terri Wood, who represents Stanislas G. Meyerhoff. Meyerhoff faces the stiffest sentence recommendation for his involvement in seven fires and the toppling of a high-tension power line. The terrorism enhancement question will be settled in his case and, under an agreement with all parties, applied to the remaining defendants. Each has pleaded guilty to charges of conspiracy and arson. A ruling that the 10 are terrorists is not likely to boost the time they spend behind bars - the prosecution recommends three to 16 years - but it could land them in tougher prisons. The fires targeted forest ranger stations, meat packing plants, wild horse corrals, lumber mill offices, research facilities, an SUV dealer and, in 1998, Vail Ski Resort. No one was injured, the defense notes in legal motions. The case, known as Operation Backfire, is the biggest prosecution ever of environmental extremists, and has turned on its head the prevailing idea that arsonists have generally acted alone, said Brent Smith, director of the Terrorism Research Center at the University of Arkansas. "We thought these people operated for the last 15 years under this kind of uncoordinated violence approach, just like the extreme right was doing - leaderless resistance," Smith said. "That's why this case is so very different." Prosecution filings argue that though the defendants were never convicted of terrorism, they qualify for the label because at least one of the fires each of them set was intended to change or retaliate against government policy. NEWS & EMAIL &raquo; RSS Headline Feeds &raquo; RGJ.com for your PDA Homes & All Other Rentals Use of this site signifies your agreement to the , updated June 7, 2005.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/P/PADILLA_TERROR_CHARGES?SITE=NVREN&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Content on this page is provided directly by the Associated Press. It is not archived on the Reno Gazette-Journal site. May 15, 5:15 PM EDT CIA Agent Testifies at Padilla Trial, Describes How Officials Got Alleged al-Qaida Form Criminal complaint against Eljvir Duka in Fort Dix plot case Hearing Transcript: Waleed Mohammed bin Attash Hearing Transcript: Khalid Sheikh Mohammed Hearing Transcript Abu Faraj al-Libi Hearing Transcript: Ramzi Binalshibh Declassified Report: Iraq 'Cause Celebre' for Extremists CIA Agent Testifies at Padilla Trial, Describes How Officials Got Alleged al-Qaida Form al-Qaida Is Changing Tactics and Expanding Its Influence, Says Former British Spy Chief Pakistani Terror Suspect Denies al-Qaida Link, Claims Torture by Americans Florida Doctor Testifies He Promised to Treat Iraqis Defending Against U.S. Troops American Counterterror Efforts Bear Fruit in Philippines, but Dangers Linger of "mujahedeen data form" linked to Padilla CIA document cited in Padilla case MIAMI (AP) -- A covert CIA officer who was permitted to testify wearing a disguise and using an alias described in court Tuesday how U.S. officials in Afghanistan obtained a truckload of al-Qaida documents, including a form later linked to suspected operative Jose Padilla. The officer, whose true identity is classified, gave his name as Tom Langston. He appeared in court with a beard and glasses, although the nature of the disguise was not obvious or made public. Prosecutors declined to say whether any concealment was even used. The arrangement was approved by U.S. District Judge Marcia Cooke at the request of the CIA, which sought to protect the officer's ability to continue doing clandestine work overseas. It was not disclosed to the jury. Langston testified that he was working in December 2001 at a classified CIA site in Kandahar, Afghanistan, when an Afghan man driving a pickup truck showed up with thousands of pages of documents. Among them was a bright blue binder containing what appeared to be dozens of forms in Arabic, one of which reportedly turned out to be Padilla's. Prosecutors say his fingerprints are on the "mujahedeen data form," which had questions on language skills, military experience, religious education and other areas. The form is crucial to the government's case because it could link Padilla and his two suspected co-conspirators - Adham Amin Hassoun and Kifah Wael Jayyousi - to al-Qaida. The three are charged with being part of a U.S.-based support cell for Islamic extremists around the world, including al-Qaida. The unidentified Afghan man, Langston said, was affiliated with an Afghan tribal leader opposed to the country's Islamic fundamentalist Taliban rulers, who were then battling U.S. forces. Under the Taliban, al-Qaida had established terrorist training camps in Afghanistan in the years leading to the Sept. 11, 2001, terrorist attacks. "He was loyal to some individuals who were cooperating with us against the Taliban and the terrorist element," the CIA officer said. The Afghan man told the CIA he collected the documents from a house occupied by Arabs who had fled shortly before the 2001 U.S. invasion and were known locally to be affiliated with al-Qaida. Langston said the man was not paid or given any other benefit by U.S. officials for the documents, although he was prohibited after prosecutors objected from answering questions about whether the man's tribal leader was compensated. "I think he took this initiative on his own," the CIA officer said of the man who brought the documents. At one point, Langston grew reluctant to answer a question from Padilla attorney Orlando do Campo about how CIA officers and analysts handle documents such as those in the binder. "I'm a little uncomfortable answering the question because it gets into methods. I'm sworn to protect sources and methods," he said. The binder and other documents were kept in a locked room at the CIA installation in Kandahar, then placed in boxes and taken on U.S. vehicles and aircraft to the FBI in Islamabad, Pakistan. The binder was in a box labeled "vegetable oil," the CIA officer said. The FBI legal attache there in late 2001, Jennifer Keenan, testified Tuesday that she remembered the binder among 22 boxes, trunks and other containers because it appeared to hold information important for U.S. counterterrorism investigators. "We were very grateful to find this," Keenan said. "I called it a pledge form. It says pledge on it." It wasn't until later that the FBI in Washington was able to link one of the forms to Padilla, who allegedly filled it out under the name Abu Abdullah al-Mujahir in July 2000. A key to making that link was information gathered during U.S. interrogations of other suspected al-Qaida figures, according to documents filed in the Padilla case. Testimony will resume Thursday. Prosecutors say their witnesses will include Yahya Goba, a member of the "Lackawanna Six" group of men who pleaded guilty in 2003 in New York to attending al-Qaida camps. Goba, who received a 10-year prison sentence, will testify that he attended the same camp as Padilla and filled out an identical form, prosecutor Brian Frazier said. Padilla, a 36-year-old former Chicago gang member and U.S. citizen, was arrested by the FBI in May 2002 when he arrived at Chicago's O'Hare International Airport. The Bush administration initially accused him of plotting to detonate a radioactive "dirty bomb" in a U.S. city, but those allegations are not part of the criminal indictment. Padilla was added to the Miami case after 3 1/2 years in military custody as an enemy combatant. His case was the subject of a lengthy legal battle over the president's wartime detention powers over U.S. citizens. Padilla and his two co-defendants face up to life in prison if convicted of all charges. NEWS & EMAIL &raquo; RSS Headline Feeds &raquo; RGJ.com for your PDA Homes & All Other Rentals Use of this site signifies your agreement to the , updated June 7, 2005.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/K/KATRINA_OPPORTUNITY?SITE=NVREN&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Content on this page is provided directly by the Associated Press. It is not archived on the Reno Gazette-Journal site. May 15, 2:10 PM EDT Middle-Class White Neighborhood in New Orleans Draws on Private Investment, Civic Organization By JOHN MORENO GONZALES sent regarding the defective levee pumps Day at the Depot: Store Becomes Community Hub AP Analysis: Katrina Insurance Katrina Insurance: The Survivors Letter from U.S. Sen. Vitter Expressing Concern Over Levee Pumps (04/13/2007) NEW ORLEANS (AP) -- Paul Pablovich was the very picture of a good neighbor as he shoveled debris off the curb and mowed other people's lawns in Lakeview, a middle-class section of town that was swamped with 15 feet of water during Hurricane Katrina and is now a patchwork of gutted and newly built homes. But he wasn't doing it entirely out of the goodness of his heart. He was protecting his investment. Pablovich, an entrepreneur who lived in a different part of New Orleans before Katrina, bought a bungalow on the street from an elderly resident after the storm, renovated it and plans to live there with his fiancee. He purchased a second abandoned house for $107,000, fixed it up and hopes to resell it for $214,000. He would like to "flip" several other properties on the block, too. The way he sees it, capitalism is the road to recovery for Lakeview. "It's how the country was built," Pablovich, 38, said of the $600,000 he has pumped into the real estate market. "Free-market economics will kick in." Lakeview, a 7,000-home mostly white enclave in a city that is predominantly black, has emerged as a success story in the reconstruction of New Orleans through entrepreneurs like Pablovich and strong civic organization that existed long before the storm. In contrast, hard-hit black middle-class neighborhoods in eastern New Orleans do not have the same financial means and civic organization, and are not drawing nearly as much private investment. As a result, their recovery is crawling. "If you're going to speculate, you're much more likely to speculate in Lakeview than you would in the east," said Louisiana State University sociology professor Jeanne Hulbert. "But you could end up, potentially, with a social and economic structure in the city that really carves out the black middle class." Nearly 21 months after Katrina, Lakeview has lights and other utilities, but still has no firehouse and no public school. But it is a community so fiercely independent it tried in the 1990s to secede from the city. And its residents - who include business executives and other professionals - have considerable organizational skills. Lakeview's churches arranged for volunteers around the country to plant trees along Canal Boulevard, the main drag. And recently, nearly 1,000 original and potential new residents came to a civic association tutorial on how to navigate the city's bureaucracy and find a reputable contractor. In fact, the civic association drew up a list of recommended contractors by running credit checks on them and consulting the Better Business Bureau. The group is so organized it has compiled its own data on rebuilding, finding in a February survey that 67 percent of Lakeview's lots were in some stage of transformation. Seventeen percent were newly inhabited, just over 26 percent were under repair, and 23 percent had been demolished to pave the way for rebuilding. In contrast, neighborhood leaders in eastern New Orleans, which encompasses four ZIP codes to Lakeview's one, are just now undertaking a house-to-house count. Independent research, at first glance, suggests Lakeview and eastern New Orleans have rebuilt at similar rates. GCR and Associates Inc. found last week that based on utility hookups, close to 36 percent of residents in the Lakeview ZIP code were back, versus 33 percent in the eastern New Orleans ZIP codes. However, Richard Campanella, associate director of Tulane and Xavier universities' Center for Biomedical Research, found that the flooding in Lakeview was, by some measures, far more severe. For example, nearly 22 percent of homes in Lakeview got more than 8 feet of water, compared with 3.5 percent in eastern New Orleans. Lakeview has eclipsed eastern New Orleans in real estate sales since Katrina. Sixty-nine houses were sold there nine months before the disaster, compared with 147 during the past nine months of recovery, a 113 percent jump. In eastern New Orleans, 215 single-family homes were sold in the nine months before Katrina, and 287 during the past nine months, a 33 percent increase. As he painted over the rust on an iron fence that ringed his family's home in eastern New Orleans, Hank Long said it was obvious to him that his part of town was rebuilding with sweat equity more often than financial equity. "In Lakeview, many of those houses were already paid for. A lot of people are still paying their mortgages here," said Long, a 60-year-old black man. "Nobody has big money here. They gutted out their house, and that's as far as they got. Whatever they could do, they did on their own." Hulbert of LSU said: "You have to remember the black middle class only took hold in the 1960s. That is different from several generations of middle-class life. Many middle-class blacks in New Orleans were the first in their families to go to college, and it appears many had their entire savings tied up in their homes." David Bell, president of the East New Orleans Neighborhood Advisory Commission, which formed in March to bind together 15 area groups, said a lack of private investment means eastern New Orleans is much more dependent on government recovery aid, with all the bureaucracy and politics that entails. For example, a centerpiece of the eastern New Orleans redevelopment plan is a proposed $100 million shopping strip. But federal grants for the project will not be fully released until the city comes up with 10 percent. Back in Lakeview, residents like to say that they ask mostly one thing of the city: for it to get out of the way. TKTMJ Inc., a builder that is selling modular homes in the neighborhood, found the area so profitable that it established an office in Lakeview and has dubbed one of its designs "The Lakeview." Tommy Callia, a sales representative with the company, noted that most of those able to rebuild are middle class and white. "I think we're not going to be as diverse as we once were, and that's going to be sad," he said. "You can say it's a little like a gumbo: If you don't have all the ingredients, something is missing in the taste." NEWS & EMAIL &raquo; RSS Headline Feeds &raquo; RGJ.com for your PDA Homes & All Other Rentals Use of this site signifies your agreement to the , updated June 7, 2005.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WILDFIRES?SITE=NVREN&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Content on this page is provided directly by the Associated Press. It is not archived on the Reno Gazette-Journal site. May 15, 1:06 PM EDT Massive Florida-Georgia Wildfire Forces Hundreds of Residents to Evacuate for Second Time Winds Fuel Multistate Wildfire Photos: Wildfires Across the U.S. Photos: Wildfire Burns in California Charges Against Crew Boss Massive Florida-Georgia Wildfire Forces Hundreds of Residents to Evacuate for Second Time Boys, Ages 12 and 16, Charged With Starting Fires in Georgia; All Blazes Involved Were Small $18 Million Estimated As Cost of Fighting Vast Ga. Wildfires; Called a 'Long-Term Battle' CITY, Fla. (AP) -- Authorities evacuated hundreds of homes after a massive wildfire along the Georgia-Florida border jumped a containment line overnight, authorities said Tuesday. Firefighters pushed the flames back to the containment line, but dry weather and 15 mph wind in north Florida was expected to further hinder their work. "If we can just get through today," said Russell Hubright, a U.S. Forest Service spokesman. Between 250 and 500 homes west of U.S. 441 had to be evacuated for a second time when the fire line was breached, Florida Highway Patrol Lt. Michael Burroughs said. An additional 570 people who were ordered out of homes east of the roadway were still waiting to return. The wildfire had raced through the Okefenokee Swamp in southeast Georgia and into northern Florida after being started by lightning more than a week ago. By Tuesday, it had burned 109,000 acres in Florida and 139,813 acres of swampland in Georgia - nearly 390 square miles in all. Flames jumped a containment line at the fire's western edge, but firefighters used bulldozers and water-dropping helicopters to extinguish them, said John Speaks, deputy incident commander with the forest service. The fire was about 1 1/2 miles from U.S. 441. On the western edge of the Okefenokee Swamp in Georgia, Fargo residents were told to stay alert as wind forecast at up to 20 mph pushed the blaze against fire breaks plowed between the swamp and the city of 380 people. "Everybody's being told not to let their guard down, don't unpack," said Laura Polant, a fire information officer in Fargo. "Residents are still being told to be prepared to leave, because the call can come at any time." In Florida, the blaze was 50 percent contained Tuesday. The smoke had lifted enough to open Interstates 10 and 75 to traffic, but drivers were warned that periodic closures were still possible. Another large wildfire, in northeastern Minnesota and Ontario, could be brought under control by the end of the week, officials said. No one has been seriously hurt in the fire, which has burned 117 square miles of Minnesota and Canada, but many cabins and smaller structures - more than 100 in all - have been destroyed. Associated Press writers Russ Bynum in Savannah, Ga., and Jennifer Kay in Miami contributed to this report. NEWS & EMAIL &raquo; RSS Headline Feeds &raquo; RGJ.com for your PDA Homes & All Other Rentals Use of this site signifies your agreement to the , updated June 7, 2005.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/I/IMMIGRATION_TEXAS?SITE=NVREN&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Content on this page is provided directly by the Associated Press. It is not archived on the Reno Gazette-Journal site. May 15, 2:46 PM EDT Groups Seek to Block Texas Town's Ordinance Prohibiting Renting to Most Illegal Immigrants Raid Captures Illegal Immigrants Shelters Provide Stability for Young Immigrants Groups Seek to Block Texas Town's Ordinance Prohibiting Renting to Most Illegal Immigrants As Party Chair, a Senator's Delicate Balance on Immigration Reflects GOP Dilemma Critics Blame Violent Police Response at Immigration Rally on LAPD's 'Warrior Culture' President Bush Presses for Bipartisan Immigration Agreement As Senate Prepares for Vote Democrats Postpone Immigration Vote to Give Bipartisan Deal More Time Memo on Prosecution of Illegal Immigrants (AP) -- Latino activists and civil liberties advocates asked a federal judge Tuesday to block a voter-approved ordinance that prohibits landlords from renting apartments to most illegal immigrants in the Dallas suburb of Farmers Branch. The Mexican American Legal Defense and Educational Fund and the American Civil Liberties Union, which have already sued the city, requested the temporary restraining order in U.S. District Court. The ordinance, scheduled to take effect next Tuesday, requires apartment managers to verify that renters are U.S. citizens or legal immigrants before leasing to them, with some exceptions. Violators face fines of up to $500. "It is unfortunate that the residents of Farmers Branch have chosen to implement a law which is not only bad policy, but is likely also unconstitutional," said Lisa Graybill, legal director for the ACLU of Texas. "Now the issue will have to be resolved in federal court." The city is preparing a response to the request, said Matthew Boyle, an attorney representing Farmers Branch. City council members first approved the ban in November without discussion, then revised it in January to include exemptions for minors, seniors and some mixed-status families. On Saturday, residents voted to approve the ban with 68 percent of voters in favor, according to unofficial results. Councilman Tim O'Hare, the ordinance's lead proponent, contends the city's economy and quality of life will improve if illegal immigrants are kept out. O'Hare declined to comment Tuesday. Since 1970, Farmers Branch has changed from a small, predominantly white bedroom community with a declining population to a city of almost 28,000 people, about 37 percent of them Hispanic, according to the U.S. Census Bureau. Farmers Branch already faces four lawsuits brought by civil rights groups, residents, property owners and businesses, who say the ordinance discriminates and puts landlords in the precarious position of acting as federal immigration officers. Their attorneys argue the ordinance attempts to regulate immigration, a duty that is exclusively the federal government's. Nationwide, more than 90 local governments have proposed, passed or rejected laws prohibiting landlords from leasing to illegal immigrants, penalizing businesses that employ them or training police to enforce immigration laws. NEWS & EMAIL &raquo; RSS Headline Feeds &raquo; RGJ.com for your PDA Homes & All Other Rentals Use of this site signifies your agreement to the , updated June 7, 2005.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/F/FORT_DRUM_MISSING_SOLDIERS?SITE=NVREN&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Content on this page is provided directly by the Associated Press. It is not archived on the Reno Gazette-Journal site. May 15, 5:04 PM EDT 7 U.S. Victims of Ambush in Iraq Are From Fort Drum; 3 Soldiers Still Missing Fort Drum Reacts to Missing Soldiers DRUM, N.Y. (AP) -- The seven American victims of a weekend ambush in Iraq were members of the storied 10th Mountain Division's 2nd Brigade Combat Team, Army officials in Iraq said Tuesday. The attack near Mahmoudiya, in a Sunni stronghold 20 miles south of Baghdad, left four U.S. soldiers and an Iraqi translator dead, and three other soldiers missing. On Monday, the Pentagon acknowledged for the first time that it believes the missing soldiers are in terrorist hands. The Islamic State of Iraq - an al-Qaida front group that has claimed to have captured the soldiers - has warned the U.S. to stop its massive search for the missing. Military officials would not release the names of the soldiers until their families were notified but confirmed they were assigned to Company D, 4th Battalion, 31st Infantry Regiment, nicknamed the "Polar Bears," said Lt. Col. Paul Fitzpatrick, a Fort Drum spokesman. All the missing soldiers are men, Fitzpatrick said. "It's been the unfortunate experience that soldiers who have been captured have not all turned out well. We are hoping this turns out to be an exception," he said. The 10th Mountain Division has a reputation for success that dates to World War II. Ready to go anywhere in the world within 48 hours, the 10th Mountain is trained to fight in steamy jungles, sandy deserts, cities and, of course, mountains. Families of the soldiers released the names of two of the dead on Monday - Sgt. 1st Class James David Connell Jr., 40, of Lake City, Tenn., and Pfc. Daniel Courneya, 19, of Vermontville, Mich. Connell's family learned of his death Saturday afternoon, they said. The soldier had just recovered from a shrapnel wound to the leg and had visited his family on leave this month. The family is now planning a memorial service in Lake City and a burial at Arlington National Cemetery, according to his brother, Jeff Connell. "I'm proud of my dad, because he didn't really fight for himself, he fought for the country," Connell's teenage daughter, Courtney, told Knoxville's WATE-TV. In Michigan, students at Maple Valley High School created a memorial for Courneya, who graduated in 2005 and was well-known in the small community southwest of Lansing. He was a member of the school's track and soccer teams and played clarinet in the band. "It's a tribute of photos, posters, plaques and a picture of him in his uniform," school official Kelly Zank told The Associated Press on Tuesday. His death was announced Monday over the school's public address system, and a moment of silence was observed, she said. Courneya's mother, Wendy Thompson, said his wife, Jennifer, called family members Saturday night to tell them he had been killed. Thompson said her husband, Army Spc. David Thompson, was in Iraq and returning home after learning of his stepson's death. If all three soldiers now missing were taken alive, it would be the biggest single abduction of U.S. soldiers in Iraq since March 23, 2003, when Pvt. Jessica Lynch and six others were captured in an ambush near Nasiriyah that also left 11 Americans dead. The 2nd Brigade Combat Team is in the 10th month of a 15-month tour in Iraq. The brigade was also deployed to Iraq in 2005. The 10th Mountain Division made its reputation in World War II, when soldiers scaled a sheer, 1,500-foot cliff under cover of darkness and fought their way through the snowy mountains of northern Italy in 1945. That spearheaded the drive that would liberate the country from the Nazis. The 10th Mountain was the Army's most frequently deployed division during the 1990s, serving in Somalia, Haiti, Bosnia, Egypt, Iraq and elsewhere. The division's members became the first regular U.S. ground troops to be sent to Central Asia as part of American's response to the Sept. 11, 2001, terrorist attacks. Its soldiers provided security for U.S. Air Force fighter and combat search-and-rescue teams in Uzbekistan. NEWS & EMAIL &raquo; RSS Headline Feeds &raquo; RGJ.com for your PDA Homes & All Other Rentals Use of this site signifies your agreement to the , updated June 7, 2005.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/B/BORDER_BIOMETRICS?SITE=NVREN&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Content on this page is provided directly by the Associated Press. It is not archived on the Reno Gazette-Journal site. May 15, 4:42 PM EDT AP IMPACT: U.S. Border Inspectors Rarely Scan Sophisticated New Face-Matching Visas Border Inspectors Rarely Scan New Visas of "laser visas" designed for use on the U.S.-Mexico border SAN DIEGO (AP) -- The face- and fingerprint-matching technology that has been touted over the past decade as a sophisticated new way to stop terrorists and illegal immigrants from entering the country through Mexico has one major drawback: U.S. border inspectors almost never use it. In fact, the necessary equipment is not even installed in vehicle lanes along the border. Government officials told The Associated Press that checking more people would create too big a backup at the border, where hours-long traffic jams are already common. Some members of Congress who voted for the system in 1996 are complaining they were misled. They said the intent was to use biometrics - or a person's unique physical traits - to screen everyone. "Congress would not have gone to the trouble of requiring biometric features on the border crossing card if it knew the administration would not require that those features be read by scanners," said Rep. Lamar Smith, R-Texas, who wrote the legislation. The U.S. government has spent tens of millions of dollars issuing visa cards digitally embedded with the holder's photo and fingerprints. Holders of the cards come across the border tens of millions of times each year. But on average, in only about 2 percent of those cases are the cardholders screened with the biometric technology to verify their identities and check law-enforcement records, said Paul Morris, Customs and Border Protection's executive director of admissibility requirements and migration control. The checks are done consistently only on the small portion of cardholders who seek permission to travel beyond the border region. "As the technology becomes available, we can expand the current level of biometric matching," Morris said. "There is not a technology solution currently available that will not cause delays that are well beyond the acceptable levels." Beginning in 1998, the high-tech "laser visas" have been issued to 9.1 million Mexicans for short visits to the United States. The laser visas, which look like driver's licenses, have a 1.4-inch optical memory stripe holding personal information such as name, gender and birth date. The stripe also stores the owner's digitized facial photo and two fingerprints. Cardholders coming across the border may be asked to press their fingers against a glass and pose for a photo, while their card pulls up their biometric file - a process that takes an extra 30 seconds or so per person. The photo and fingerprints can also be instantly checked against criminal and terrorist watch lists. The laser visas entitle Mexicans to travel 25 miles from the border - slightly farther in Arizona - for 30 days. Cardholders can also apply for a permit to travel anywhere in the U.S. for up to six months. Border inspectors routinely swipe the laser visas through a machine to retrieve the basic personal information and to call up a photo. But, with some exceptions, the inspectors use the facial- and fingerprint-matching technology only for those applying at the border for one of the six-month permits, Morris said. That practice means that most of those who are checked are not selected at random; they know they are going to be scanned when they come across. The government contract for laser visas was worth $28.6 million from 2000 to 2006, and Homeland Security awarded a five-year renewal in March to General Dynamics Corp. worth $28.5 million, according to Homeland Security. That price tag excludes the cost of opening new consulates to handle the rush of applicants. The State Department established consulates across the border from Laredo, Texas, and Nogales, Ariz. In Tijuana, Mexico, the consulate took over an old gymnasium across town. The 1996 law said anyone presenting a border crossing card "is not permitted to cross over the border into the U.S. unless the biometric identifier contained on the card matches the appropriate biometric characteristics of the alien." But Sandra Raynes, consular officer at the U.S. consulate in Tijuana, said: "If they were to check everyone, you'd have lines all the way down to Cabo San Lucas," about 1,100 miles south of San Diego. U.S. officials said biometrics are only part of its effort to stem illegal crossings. An inspector's wits and agency intelligence are also key, they said. Biometrics "is one tool in our toolbox," said Kelly Klundt, a Customs and Border Protection spokeswoman. Also, the laminated cards have reduced fraud because they are difficult to counterfeit, officials said. Older visas looked like crumpled library cards, some dating to the 1950s. Authorities said women in their 60s used cards with photographs of teenage girls because the cards had no expiration dates. Former Rep. Jim Kolbe, a Republican who left Congress in January after 22 years representing a district on the Arizona border, said lawmakers expected checks on all cardholders, though there was no timetable. "We definitely intended to go further with it than we have," he said. "Ten years later, it seems incredible that we've only gotten this far with it." The 14 pedestrian booths at San Ysidro, the nation's busiest border crossing by far, are equipped with fingerprint glass but no cameras. But that glass is not used on the 30,000 people who walk though daily. There is neither type of equipment in the 24 vehicle lanes, which handle about 35,000 cars and 250 buses a day. Applicants for the six-month permits are asked to pull aside into a small parking lot, get out and walk up to a booth, where they are fingerprinted and photographed for verification. Initially, border crossings did not even have equipment to lift personal information off the cards, let alone the biometric data. Jeffrey Davidow, U.S. ambassador to Mexico from 1998 to 2001, recalls members of Congress visiting the border to see the machines, which were never used when the lawmakers were gone. "I'd tell them that it was all show, that it doesn't work, that the card is not doing what it's supposed to do," Davidow said. He said his warnings elicited shrugs. There were also technological setbacks. Equipment to verify photos and fingerprints often failed to read through sweat, scratches and other wallet "crud," according to an internal Homeland Security report. A test at five Texas crossings in the spring of 2004 showed that 731 out of 1,740 cards, or 42 percent, were unreadable, according to the report, which was provided to The Associated Press by someone who insisted on anonymity because the government did not authorize its release. Homeland Security officials did not have more recent figures on how many cards are correctly read. But they said technical problems have been resolved. NEWS & EMAIL &raquo; RSS Headline Feeds &raquo; RGJ.com for your PDA Homes & All Other Rentals Use of this site signifies your agreement to the , updated June 7, 2005.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/P/PESTICIDES_SCHOOLS?SITE=NVREN&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Content on this page is provided directly by the Associated Press. It is not archived on the Reno Gazette-Journal site. May 15, 5:27 PM EDT AP Investigation Finds Children in Agricultural States Have Been Exposed to Farm Chemicals Pesticide Drift Sickens Students Pollution Levels in U.S. Streams STRATHMORE, Calif. (AP) -- On Grandparents Day, Domitila Lemus accompanied her 8-year-old granddaughter to school. As the girls lined up behind Sunnyside Union Elementary, a foul mist drifted onto the playground from the adjacent orange groves, witnesses say. Lemus started coughing, and two children collapsed in spasms, vomiting on the blacktop. She and the little girls have since recovered without apparent lasting effects. But an Associated Press investigation has found that over the past decade, hundreds, possibly thousands, of schoolchildren in California and other agricultural states have been exposed to farm chemicals linked to sickness, brain damage and birth defects. The family of at least one California teenager suspects pesticides caused her death. There are no federal laws specifically against spraying near schools, and advocates say California and the seven other states that have laws or policies creating buffer zones around schools to protect them from pesticides don't do enough to enforce them. "The regulations are inadequate. In the vast majority of cases, people who didn't follow the laws received at best a $400 fine," said Margaret Reeves, a scientist with the Pesticide Action Network, a nonprofit organization based in San Francisco. The pesticide industry says it is committed to safety, and regulators say they are doing their best to enforce the laws. "Everyone wants to protect children," said California Department of Pesticide Regulation spokesman Glenn Brank. He said his agency is doing what it can to enforce the law with a shortage of agricultural inspectors. In the Strathmore incident last November, grandparents said the spraying was being done less than 150 feet from the children. Tulare County authorities fined an unlicensed pest removal company $1,100 for spraying a restricted weed killer that morning. But no action was taken over what witnesses said happened to the children. Because no one reported the incident as a case of pesticide drift, county agricultural inspectors never swabbed the jungle gym or took grass samples, making it impossible to establish whether pesticide had, in fact, drifted onto the playground. The Environmental Protection Agency does not keep comprehensive national figures on students and teachers sickened by drifting pesticide. In California, the No. 1 farm state and the one with the best records, there were 590 pesticide-related illnesses at schools from 1996 to 2005, according to figures given to the AP by the state. More than a third of those were due to pesticide drift, the figures show. Activists say that those numbers are low and that many cases are never even reported. In California's long, flat interior, spraying season lasts seven months, from March through September. When citrus trees blossom and grapevines climb trellises, Lemus prays to the Virgin Mary that her granddaughter won't come home with her eyes watering and head pounding, unable to breathe. Tulare County, where she lives, is one of the nation's most fertile farm regions, with more than half the schools within a quarter-mile of agricultural fields, according to the nonprofit Center on Race, Poverty and the Environment. As suburbs push close to farmland, the rate of pesticide poisoning among children nationwide has risen in recent years, according to a 2005 study in the Journal of the American Medical Association. The study found that 40 percent of all children sickened by pesticides at school were victims of drift - pesticide carried on the breeze. Research on pregnant women exposed to common pesticides has suggested higher rates of premature birth, and poor neurological development and smaller head circumferences among their babies. The effects on children of small, repeated exposures over a long period of time are unclear, said University of California, Berkeley epidemiologist Brenda Eskenazi. But acute pesticide poisoning can cause nausea, blurred vision, an abnormally fast heart rate, paralysis and death. Chrissy Garavito, a 15-year-old high school sophomore, died in Fontana in 1997 of a heart rhythm disturbance her mother believes was triggered by exposure to chemicals sprayed at the school. Authorities never confirmed that pesticides contributed to her death. In 2001, pesticide poisoning nearly killed Elena Dominguez, then a sixth-grader in Wenatchee, Wash. One day, after playing Frisbee during gym class across the street from an apple orchard, she passed out at her desk. "She was in a stupor," said her mother, Cindy Dominguez. "She couldn't talk, her eyes were rolling back in her head." Emergency room doctors dismissed Elena's abnormally fast heart rate as a symptom of dehydration, gave her intravenous fluids and sent her home. Three weeks later, it happened again. "I was at a track meet and all of a sudden I felt really, really tired," said Elena, now 18. "I made it to the finish line and just fell over." Investigators found her clothes were soaked in the pesticide Endosulfan I; it had been picked up from residue on the grass and absorbed into her bloodstream through her skin. Officials later found five other pesticides on school grounds and fined the apple grower for forging his applicator's license. The Dominguez family sued the orchard owner and the Wenatchee school district, which established rules requiring students to stay inside after a spraying, among other things. State officials believe it is the only district in Washington with such limitations. But keeping students inside Two years ago, 600 students and staff members were evacuated from an Edinburg, Texas, elementary school after pesticides drifted from a cotton field into the school's air conditioning system. Thirty-nine people developed nausea and headaches. EPA officials say they have no real idea how often pesticides waft onto school grounds. The EPA must register pesticides before they are sold, but federal law does not restrict where they can be sprayed. "We implement the laws that Congress gives us," said Ruth Allen, an EPA epidemiologist. Once the EPA approves a product, federal law requires manufacturers to report any "unreasonable adverse effects on the environment of the pesticide" that their products cause. Activists say industry is essentially allowed to police itself. CropLife America, a national organization representing suppliers of farm pesticides, said their use near schools is well-regulated. "We're really committed to public safety," said spokeswoman Donna Uchida. "Any kind of use of a pesticide has a labeling requirement that is imposed to protect human health and the environment." California has some of the strictest pesticide laws in the nation. Under state law, growers and pest control companies can be fined if pesticide drifts from a field and sickens people. A 2002 state law allows county authorities to establish a no-spray buffer zone of a quarter-mile around schools. But Tulare County has not done so. State officials said they did not know how many counties have set up such buffer zones. Lemus and environmentalists are pushing for pesticide-free zones throughout California. "Why don't they tell us they'll spray beforehand so we can bring our children inside?" Lemus said. NEWS & EMAIL &raquo; RSS Headline Feeds &raquo; RGJ.com for your PDA Homes & All Other Rentals Use of this site signifies your agreement to the , updated June 7, 2005.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/M/MISSING_OFFICER?SITE=NVREN&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Content on this page is provided directly by the Associated Press. It is not archived on the Reno Gazette-Journal site. May 15, 4:25 PM EDT S.C. Authorities Search for Constable Who Disappeared After Traffic Stop; Cruiser Set on Fire S.C. (AP) -- Dozens of police officers and bloodhounds searched for a missing constable Tuesday after his empty cruiser was found in flames several miles from where he was last seen at a traffic stop, authorities said. Charleston County Sheriff Al Cannon said authorities had identified a "person of interest" who was being sought on an unrelated weapons charge. But he said officials don't know what happened to Robert Lee Bailey, a 66-year-old constable who works for the Lincolnville Police Department. "It certainly does not look good. But we are hopeful. We have no explanation for what occurred," Cannon said. He said the shooting was not believed to be related to the traffic stop. Bailey was last seen when he pulled a vehicle over about 10:30 p.m. Monday in Lincolnville. Witnesses reported hearing gunshots a few minutes later, and Bailey's cap, two guns, bullet casings and blood were found in a yard. About an hour later, a Highway Patrol officer spotted Bailey's burning car in the parking lot of a church off Interstate 26. Cannon said officials wanted to speak to a 24-year-old man wanted on a federal weapons charge. Walter Fayall, of St. Stephens, was being sought by the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco and Firearms. No charges had been filed against him in the missing officer case. Authorities also issued an alert for a black Chevrolet Caprice. Along highways near Lincolnville, a small town about 20 miles west of Charleston, electronic signs listed a fugitive alert. Gary Tucker, data analyst for Faith Assembly of God Church, saw the charred remains of the cruiser early Tuesday. "I just noticed it was a police car and it was torched. And the back window was smashed out," he said. The South Carolina Law Enforcement Division sent agents to help in the investigation, spokeswoman Kathryn Richardson said. Constables assist law enforcement agencies and may carry firearms. They must complete a basic training course at a state technical college before they can be appointed by the governor. Associated Press Writer Katrina A. Goggins in Columbia contributed to this report. NEWS & EMAIL &raquo; RSS Headline Feeds &raquo; RGJ.com for your PDA Homes & All Other Rentals Use of this site signifies your agreement to the , updated June 7, 2005.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WILDFIRES?SITE=ALMON&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Make us your homepage May 15, 1:06 PM EDT Hundreds More Flee Massive Fla. Wildfire Winds Fuel Multistate Wildfire Photos: Wildfires Across the U.S. Photos: Wildfire Burns in California Charges Against Crew Boss Hundreds More Flee Massive Fla. Wildfire 2 Kids Charged in Ga. Wildfires Ga. Wildfire Called 'A Long-Term Battle' CITY, Fla. (AP) -- Authorities evacuated hundreds of homes after a massive wildfire along the Georgia-Florida border jumped a containment line overnight, authorities said Tuesday. Firefighters pushed the flames back to the containment line, but dry weather and 15 mph wind in north Florida was expected to further hinder their work. "If we can just get through today," said Russell Hubright, a U.S. Forest Service spokesman. Between 250 and 500 homes west of U.S. 441 had to be evacuated for a second time when the fire line was breached, Florida Highway Patrol Lt. Michael Burroughs said. An additional 570 people who were ordered out of homes east of the roadway were still waiting to return. The wildfire had raced through the Okefenokee Swamp in southeast Georgia and into northern Florida after being started by lightning more than a week ago. By Tuesday, it had burned 109,000 acres in Florida and 139,813 acres of swampland in Georgia - nearly 390 square miles in all. Flames jumped a containment line at the fire's western edge, but firefighters used bulldozers and water-dropping helicopters to extinguish them, said John Speaks, deputy incident commander with the forest service. The fire was about 1 1/2 miles from U.S. 441. On the western edge of the Okefenokee Swamp in Georgia, Fargo residents were told to stay alert as wind forecast at up to 20 mph pushed the blaze against fire breaks plowed between the swamp and the city of 380 people. "Everybody's being told not to let their guard down, don't unpack," said Laura Polant, a fire information officer in Fargo. "Residents are still being told to be prepared to leave, because the call can come at any time." In Florida, the blaze was 50 percent contained Tuesday. The smoke had lifted enough to open Interstates 10 and 75 to traffic, but drivers were warned that periodic closures were still possible. Another large wildfire, in northeastern Minnesota and Ontario, could be brought under control by the end of the week, officials said. No one has been seriously hurt in the fire, which has burned 117 square miles of Minnesota and Canada, but many cabins and smaller structures - more than 100 in all - have been destroyed. Associated Press writers Russ Bynum in Savannah, Ga., and Jennifer Kay in Miami contributed to this report. &copy; 1997- 2005 The Advertiser Co. Use of this site signifies your agreement to the
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/P/PESTICIDES_SCHOOLS?SITE=ALMON&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Make us your homepage May 15, 5:27 PM EDT AP: Children Face Exposure to Pesticides Pesticide Drift Sickens Students Pollution Levels in U.S. Streams STRATHMORE, Calif. (AP) -- On Grandparents Day, Domitila Lemus accompanied her 8-year-old granddaughter to school. As the girls lined up behind Sunnyside Union Elementary, a foul mist drifted onto the playground from the adjacent orange groves, witnesses say. Lemus started coughing, and two children collapsed in spasms, vomiting on the blacktop. She and the little girls have since recovered without apparent lasting effects. But an Associated Press investigation has found that over the past decade, hundreds, possibly thousands, of schoolchildren in California and other agricultural states have been exposed to farm chemicals linked to sickness, brain damage and birth defects. The family of at least one California teenager suspects pesticides caused her death. There are no federal laws specifically against spraying near schools, and advocates say California and the seven other states that have laws or policies creating buffer zones around schools to protect them from pesticides don't do enough to enforce them. "The regulations are inadequate. In the vast majority of cases, people who didn't follow the laws received at best a $400 fine," said Margaret Reeves, a scientist with the Pesticide Action Network, a nonprofit organization based in San Francisco. The pesticide industry says it is committed to safety, and regulators say they are doing their best to enforce the laws. "Everyone wants to protect children," said California Department of Pesticide Regulation spokesman Glenn Brank. He said his agency is doing what it can to enforce the law with a shortage of agricultural inspectors. In the Strathmore incident last November, grandparents said the spraying was being done less than 150 feet from the children. Tulare County authorities fined an unlicensed pest removal company $1,100 for spraying a restricted weed killer that morning. But no action was taken over what witnesses said happened to the children. Because no one reported the incident as a case of pesticide drift, county agricultural inspectors never swabbed the jungle gym or took grass samples, making it impossible to establish whether pesticide had, in fact, drifted onto the playground. The Environmental Protection Agency does not keep comprehensive national figures on students and teachers sickened by drifting pesticide. In California, the No. 1 farm state and the one with the best records, there were 590 pesticide-related illnesses at schools from 1996 to 2005, according to figures given to the AP by the state. More than a third of those were due to pesticide drift, the figures show. Activists say that those numbers are low and that many cases are never even reported. In California's long, flat interior, spraying season lasts seven months, from March through September. When citrus trees blossom and grapevines climb trellises, Lemus prays to the Virgin Mary that her granddaughter won't come home with her eyes watering and head pounding, unable to breathe. Tulare County, where she lives, is one of the nation's most fertile farm regions, with more than half the schools within a quarter-mile of agricultural fields, according to the nonprofit Center on Race, Poverty and the Environment. As suburbs push close to farmland, the rate of pesticide poisoning among children nationwide has risen in recent years, according to a 2005 study in the Journal of the American Medical Association. The study found that 40 percent of all children sickened by pesticides at school were victims of drift - pesticide carried on the breeze. Research on pregnant women exposed to common pesticides has suggested higher rates of premature birth, and poor neurological development and smaller head circumferences among their babies. The effects on children of small, repeated exposures over a long period of time are unclear, said University of California, Berkeley epidemiologist Brenda Eskenazi. But acute pesticide poisoning can cause nausea, blurred vision, an abnormally fast heart rate, paralysis and death. Chrissy Garavito, a 15-year-old high school sophomore, died in Fontana in 1997 of a heart rhythm disturbance her mother believes was triggered by exposure to chemicals sprayed at the school. Authorities never confirmed that pesticides contributed to her death. In 2001, pesticide poisoning nearly killed Elena Dominguez, then a sixth-grader in Wenatchee, Wash. One day, after playing Frisbee during gym class across the street from an apple orchard, she passed out at her desk. "She was in a stupor," said her mother, Cindy Dominguez. "She couldn't talk, her eyes were rolling back in her head." Emergency room doctors dismissed Elena's abnormally fast heart rate as a symptom of dehydration, gave her intravenous fluids and sent her home. Three weeks later, it happened again. "I was at a track meet and all of a sudden I felt really, really tired," said Elena, now 18. "I made it to the finish line and just fell over." Investigators found her clothes were soaked in the pesticide Endosulfan I; it had been picked up from residue on the grass and absorbed into her bloodstream through her skin. Officials later found five other pesticides on school grounds and fined the apple grower for forging his applicator's license. The Dominguez family sued the orchard owner and the Wenatchee school district, which established rules requiring students to stay inside after a spraying, among other things. State officials believe it is the only district in Washington with such limitations. But keeping students inside Two years ago, 600 students and staff members were evacuated from an Edinburg, Texas, elementary school after pesticides drifted from a cotton field into the school's air conditioning system. Thirty-nine people developed nausea and headaches. EPA officials say they have no real idea how often pesticides waft onto school grounds. The EPA must register pesticides before they are sold, but federal law does not restrict where they can be sprayed. "We implement the laws that Congress gives us," said Ruth Allen, an EPA epidemiologist. Once the EPA approves a product, federal law requires manufacturers to report any "unreasonable adverse effects on the environment of the pesticide" that their products cause. Activists say industry is essentially allowed to police itself. CropLife America, a national organization representing suppliers of farm pesticides, said their use near schools is well-regulated. "We're really committed to public safety," said spokeswoman Donna Uchida. "Any kind of use of a pesticide has a labeling requirement that is imposed to protect human health and the environment." California has some of the strictest pesticide laws in the nation. Under state law, growers and pest control companies can be fined if pesticide drifts from a field and sickens people. A 2002 state law allows county authorities to establish a no-spray buffer zone of a quarter-mile around schools. But Tulare County has not done so. State officials said they did not know how many counties have set up such buffer zones. Lemus and environmentalists are pushing for pesticide-free zones throughout California. "Why don't they tell us they'll spray beforehand so we can bring our children inside?" Lemus said. &copy; 1997- 2005 The Advertiser Co. Use of this site signifies your agreement to the
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/I/IMMIGRATION_TEXAS?SITE=ALMON&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Make us your homepage May 15, 2:46 PM EDT Groups: Block Texas Town's Immigrant Ban Raid Captures Illegal Immigrants Shelters Provide Stability for Young Immigrants Groups: Block Texas Town's Immigrant Ban GOP Weighs Balance on Immigration Critics Bash 'Warrior Culture' of LAPD Bush Pushes Bipartisan Immigration Talks Reid Extends Negotiations on Immigration Memo on Prosecution of Illegal Immigrants (AP) -- Latino activists and civil liberties advocates asked a federal judge Tuesday to block a voter-approved ordinance that prohibits landlords from renting apartments to most illegal immigrants in the Dallas suburb of Farmers Branch. The Mexican American Legal Defense and Educational Fund and the American Civil Liberties Union, which have already sued the city, requested the temporary restraining order in U.S. District Court. The ordinance, scheduled to take effect next Tuesday, requires apartment managers to verify that renters are U.S. citizens or legal immigrants before leasing to them, with some exceptions. Violators face fines of up to $500. "It is unfortunate that the residents of Farmers Branch have chosen to implement a law which is not only bad policy, but is likely also unconstitutional," said Lisa Graybill, legal director for the ACLU of Texas. "Now the issue will have to be resolved in federal court." The city is preparing a response to the request, said Matthew Boyle, an attorney representing Farmers Branch. City council members first approved the ban in November without discussion, then revised it in January to include exemptions for minors, seniors and some mixed-status families. On Saturday, residents voted to approve the ban with 68 percent of voters in favor, according to unofficial results. Councilman Tim O'Hare, the ordinance's lead proponent, contends the city's economy and quality of life will improve if illegal immigrants are kept out. O'Hare declined to comment Tuesday. Since 1970, Farmers Branch has changed from a small, predominantly white bedroom community with a declining population to a city of almost 28,000 people, about 37 percent of them Hispanic, according to the U.S. Census Bureau. Farmers Branch already faces four lawsuits brought by civil rights groups, residents, property owners and businesses, who say the ordinance discriminates and puts landlords in the precarious position of acting as federal immigration officers. Their attorneys argue the ordinance attempts to regulate immigration, a duty that is exclusively the federal government's. Nationwide, more than 90 local governments have proposed, passed or rejected laws prohibiting landlords from leasing to illegal immigrants, penalizing businesses that employ them or training police to enforce immigration laws. &copy; 1997- 2005 The Advertiser Co. Use of this site signifies your agreement to the
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/A/ARSON_PLEAS?SITE=ALMON&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Make us your homepage May 15, 10:48 AM EDT Arsonists, Yes. but Are They Terrorists? Ore. (AP) -- Their guilt isn't in question. The six men and four women already admitted being involved in a series of arson fires that did $40 million in damage to research facilities, a ski resort and other businesses in the West. But are they terrorists as the government says? A federal judge was set to hear arguments Tuesday on a motion by the government to add a so-called terrorism enhancement to their sentences. Prosecutors want Judge Ann Aiken to declare the group terrorists - something defense attorneys argue has never happened in 1,200 arsons nationwide claimed by Earth Liberation Front and Animal Liberation Front. The defense argues that branding their clients terrorists is more about politics than sentencing. "The Government has Attorney General Alberto Gonzales' political agenda to advance with this case, and nothing else to lose if the Court declines to impose the enhancement," wrote attorney Terri Wood, who represents Stanislas G. Meyerhoff. Meyerhoff faces the stiffest sentence recommendation for his involvement in seven fires and the toppling of a high-tension power line. The terrorism enhancement question will be settled in his case and, under an agreement with all parties, applied to the remaining defendants. Each has pleaded guilty to charges of conspiracy and arson. A ruling that the 10 are terrorists is not likely to boost the time they spend behind bars - the prosecution recommends three to 16 years - but it could land them in tougher prisons. The fires targeted forest ranger stations, meat packing plants, wild horse corrals, lumber mill offices, research facilities, an SUV dealer and, in 1998, Vail Ski Resort. No one was injured, the defense notes in legal motions. The case, known as Operation Backfire, is the biggest prosecution ever of environmental extremists, and has turned on its head the prevailing idea that arsonists have generally acted alone, said Brent Smith, director of the Terrorism Research Center at the University of Arkansas. "We thought these people operated for the last 15 years under this kind of uncoordinated violence approach, just like the extreme right was doing - leaderless resistance," Smith said. "That's why this case is so very different." Prosecution filings argue that though the defendants were never convicted of terrorism, they qualify for the label because at least one of the fires each of them set was intended to change or retaliate against government policy. &copy; 1997- 2005 The Advertiser Co. Use of this site signifies your agreement to the
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/B/BORDER_BIOMETRICS?SITE=ALMON&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Make us your homepage May 15, 6:36 PM EDT AP IMPACT: Laser Visas Are Rarely Used Border Inspectors Rarely Scan New Visas of "laser visas" designed for use on the U.S.-Mexico border SAN DIEGO (AP) -- The face- and fingerprint-matching technology that has been touted over the past decade as a sophisticated new way to stop terrorists and illegal immigrants from entering the country through Mexico has one major drawback: U.S. border inspectors almost never use it. In fact, the necessary equipment is not even installed in vehicle lanes along the border. Government officials told The Associated Press that checking more people would create too big a backup at the border, where hours-long traffic jams are already common. Some members of Congress who voted for the system in 1996 are complaining they were misled. They said the intent was to use biometrics - or a person's unique physical traits - to screen everyone. "Congress would not have gone to the trouble of requiring biometric features on the border crossing card if it knew the administration would not require that those features be read by scanners," said Rep. Lamar Smith, R-Texas, who wrote the legislation. The U.S. government has spent tens of millions of dollars issuing visa cards digitally embedded with the holder's photo and fingerprints. Holders of the cards come across the border tens of millions of times each year. But on average, in only about 2 percent of those cases are the cardholders screened with the biometric technology to verify their identities and check law-enforcement records, said Paul Morris, Customs and Border Protection's executive director of admissibility requirements and migration control. The checks are done consistently only on the small portion of cardholders who seek permission to travel beyond the border region. "As the technology becomes available, we can expand the current level of biometric matching," Morris said. "There is not a technology solution currently available that will not cause delays that are well beyond the acceptable levels." Beginning in 1998, the high-tech "laser visas" have been issued to 9.1 million Mexicans for short visits to the United States. The laser visas, which look like driver's licenses, have a 1.4-inch optical memory stripe holding personal information such as name, gender and birth date. The stripe also stores the owner's digitized facial photo and two fingerprints. Cardholders coming across the border may be asked to press their fingers against a glass and pose for a photo, while their card pulls up their biometric file - a process that takes an extra 30 seconds or so per person. The photo and fingerprints can also be instantly checked against criminal and terrorist watch lists. The laser visas entitle Mexicans to travel 25 miles from the border - slightly farther in Arizona - for 30 days. Cardholders can also apply for a permit to travel anywhere in the U.S. for up to six months. Border inspectors routinely swipe the laser visas through a machine to retrieve the basic personal information and to call up a photo. But, with some exceptions, the inspectors use the facial- and fingerprint-matching technology only for those applying at the border for one of the six-month permits, Morris said. That practice means that most of those who are checked are not selected at random; they know they are going to be scanned when they come across. The government contract for laser visas was worth $28.6 million from 2000 to 2006, and Homeland Security awarded a five-year renewal in March to General Dynamics Corp. worth $28.5 million, according to Homeland Security. That price tag excludes the cost of opening new consulates to handle the rush of applicants. The State Department established consulates across the border from Laredo, Texas, and Nogales, Ariz. In Tijuana, Mexico, the consulate took over an old gymnasium across town. The 1996 law said anyone presenting a border crossing card "is not permitted to cross over the border into the U.S. unless the biometric identifier contained on the card matches the appropriate biometric characteristics of the alien." But Sandra Raynes, consular officer at the U.S. consulate in Tijuana, said: "If they were to check everyone, you'd have lines all the way down to Cabo San Lucas," about 1,100 miles south of San Diego. U.S. officials said biometrics are only part of its effort to stem illegal crossings. An inspector's wits and agency intelligence are also key, they said. Biometrics "is one tool in our toolbox," said Kelly Klundt, a Customs and Border Protection spokeswoman. Also, the laminated cards have reduced fraud because they are difficult to counterfeit, officials said. Older visas looked like crumpled library cards, some dating to the 1950s. Authorities said women in their 60s used cards with photographs of teenage girls because the cards had no expiration dates. Former Rep. Jim Kolbe, a Republican who left Congress in January after 22 years representing a district on the Arizona border, said lawmakers expected checks on all cardholders, though there was no timetable. "We definitely intended to go further with it than we have," he said. "Ten years later, it seems incredible that we've only gotten this far with it." The 14 pedestrian booths at San Ysidro, the nation's busiest border crossing by far, are equipped with fingerprint glass but no cameras. But that glass is not used on the 30,000 people who walk though daily. There is neither type of equipment in the 24 vehicle lanes, which handle about 35,000 cars and 250 buses a day. Applicants for the six-month permits are asked to pull aside into a small parking lot, get out and walk up to a booth, where they are fingerprinted and photographed for verification. Initially, border crossings did not even have equipment to lift personal information off the cards, let alone the biometric data. Jeffrey Davidow, U.S. ambassador to Mexico from 1998 to 2001, recalls members of Congress visiting the border to see the machines, which were never used when the lawmakers were gone. "I'd tell them that it was all show, that it doesn't work, that the card is not doing what it's supposed to do," Davidow said. He said his warnings elicited shrugs. There were also technological setbacks. Equipment to verify photos and fingerprints often failed to read through sweat, scratches and other wallet "crud," according to an internal Homeland Security report. A test at five Texas crossings in the spring of 2004 showed that 731 out of 1,740 cards, or 42 percent, were unreadable, according to the report, which was provided to The Associated Press by someone who insisted on anonymity because the government did not authorize its release. Homeland Security officials did not have more recent figures on how many cards are correctly read. But they said technical problems have been resolved. &copy; 1997- 2005 The Advertiser Co. Use of this site signifies your agreement to the
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/F/FORT_DRUM_MISSING_SOLDIERS?SITE=ALMON&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Make us your homepage May 15, 7:03 PM EDT Missing Soldiers From Fort Drum Fort Drum Reacts to Missing Soldiers DRUM, N.Y. (AP) -- The seven American victims of a weekend ambush in Iraq were members of the storied 10th Mountain Division's 2nd Brigade Combat Team, Army officials in Iraq said Tuesday. The attack near Mahmoudiya, in a Sunni stronghold 20 miles south of Baghdad, left four U.S. soldiers and an Iraqi translator dead, and three other soldiers missing. On Monday, the Pentagon acknowledged for the first time that it believes the missing soldiers are in terrorist hands. The Islamic State of Iraq - an al-Qaida front group that has claimed to have captured the soldiers - has warned the U.S. to stop its massive search for the missing. Military officials confirmed the soldiers were assigned to Company D, 4th Battalion, 31st Infantry Regiment, nicknamed the "Polar Bears," said Lt. Col. Paul Fitzpatrick, a Fort Drum spokesman. "It's been the unfortunate experience that soldiers who have been captured have not all turned out well. We are hoping this turns out to be an exception," he said. The 10th Mountain Division has a reputation for success that dates to World War II. Ready to go anywhere in the world within 48 hours, the 10th Mountain is trained to fight in steamy jungles, sandy deserts, cities and, of course, mountains. The Pentagon confirmed the dead as Sgt. 1st Class James D. Connell Jr., 40, of Lake City, Tenn.; Pfc. Daniel W. Courneya, 19, of Nashville, Mich.; and Pfc. Christopher E. Murphy, 21, of Lynchburg, Va. The four other soldiers are Sgt. Anthony J. Schober, 23, of Reno, Nev.; Spc. Alex R. Jimenez, 25, of Lawrence, Mass.; Pfc. Joseph J. Anzack Jr., 20, of Torrance, Calif.; and Pvt. Byron W. Fouty, 19, of Waterford, Mich. The Pentagon said one of those four was among the dead, but it could not confirm which one. Connell's family learned of his death Saturday afternoon, relatives said. The soldier had just recovered from a shrapnel wound to the leg and had visited his family on leave this month. The family is now planning a memorial service in Lake City and a burial at Arlington National Cemetery, according to his brother, Jeff Connell. "I'm proud of my dad, because he didn't really fight for himself, he fought for the country," Connell's teenage daughter, Courtney, told Knoxville's WATE-TV. In Michigan, students at Maple Valley High School created a memorial for Courneya, who graduated in 2005 and was well-known in the small community southwest of Lansing. He was a member of the school's track and soccer teams and played clarinet in the band. "It's a tribute of photos, posters, plaques and a picture of him in his uniform," school official Kelly Zank told The Associated Press on Tuesday. His death was announced Monday over the school's public address system, and a moment of silence was observed, she said. Courneya's mother, Wendy Thompson, said his wife, Jennifer, called family members Saturday night to tell them he had been killed. Thompson said her husband, Army Spc. David Thompson, was in Iraq and returning home after learning of his stepson's death. If all three soldiers now missing were taken alive, it would be the biggest single abduction of U.S. soldiers in Iraq since March 23, 2003, when Pvt. Jessica Lynch and six others were captured in an ambush near Nasiriyah that also left 11 Americans dead. The 2nd Brigade Combat Team is in the 10th month of a 15-month tour in Iraq. The brigade was also deployed to Iraq in 2005. The 10th Mountain Division made its reputation in World War II, when soldiers scaled a sheer, 1,500-foot cliff under cover of darkness and fought their way through the snowy mountains of northern Italy in 1945. That spearheaded the drive that would liberate the country from the Nazis. The 10th Mountain was the Army's most frequently deployed division during the 1990s, serving in Somalia, Haiti, Bosnia, Egypt, Iraq and elsewhere. The division's members became the first regular U.S. ground troops to be sent to Central Asia as part of American's response to the Sept. 11, 2001, terrorist attacks. Its soldiers provided security for U.S. Air Force fighter and combat search-and-rescue teams in Uzbekistan. &copy; 1997- 2005 The Advertiser Co. Use of this site signifies your agreement to the
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/K/KATRINA_OPPORTUNITY?SITE=ALMON&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Make us your homepage May 15, 2:10 PM EDT New Orleans Neighborhood Rescues Itself By JOHN MORENO GONZALES sent regarding the defective levee pumps Day at the Depot: Store Becomes Community Hub AP Analysis: Katrina Insurance Katrina Insurance: The Survivors Letter from U.S. Sen. Vitter Expressing Concern Over Levee Pumps (04/13/2007) NEW ORLEANS (AP) -- Paul Pablovich was the very picture of a good neighbor as he shoveled debris off the curb and mowed other people's lawns in Lakeview, a middle-class section of town that was swamped with 15 feet of water during Hurricane Katrina and is now a patchwork of gutted and newly built homes. But he wasn't doing it entirely out of the goodness of his heart. He was protecting his investment. Pablovich, an entrepreneur who lived in a different part of New Orleans before Katrina, bought a bungalow on the street from an elderly resident after the storm, renovated it and plans to live there with his fiancee. He purchased a second abandoned house for $107,000, fixed it up and hopes to resell it for $214,000. He would like to "flip" several other properties on the block, too. The way he sees it, capitalism is the road to recovery for Lakeview. "It's how the country was built," Pablovich, 38, said of the $600,000 he has pumped into the real estate market. "Free-market economics will kick in." Lakeview, a 7,000-home mostly white enclave in a city that is predominantly black, has emerged as a success story in the reconstruction of New Orleans through entrepreneurs like Pablovich and strong civic organization that existed long before the storm. In contrast, hard-hit black middle-class neighborhoods in eastern New Orleans do not have the same financial means and civic organization, and are not drawing nearly as much private investment. As a result, their recovery is crawling. "If you're going to speculate, you're much more likely to speculate in Lakeview than you would in the east," said Louisiana State University sociology professor Jeanne Hulbert. "But you could end up, potentially, with a social and economic structure in the city that really carves out the black middle class." Nearly 21 months after Katrina, Lakeview has lights and other utilities, but still has no firehouse and no public school. But it is a community so fiercely independent it tried in the 1990s to secede from the city. And its residents - who include business executives and other professionals - have considerable organizational skills. Lakeview's churches arranged for volunteers around the country to plant trees along Canal Boulevard, the main drag. And recently, nearly 1,000 original and potential new residents came to a civic association tutorial on how to navigate the city's bureaucracy and find a reputable contractor. In fact, the civic association drew up a list of recommended contractors by running credit checks on them and consulting the Better Business Bureau. The group is so organized it has compiled its own data on rebuilding, finding in a February survey that 67 percent of Lakeview's lots were in some stage of transformation. Seventeen percent were newly inhabited, just over 26 percent were under repair, and 23 percent had been demolished to pave the way for rebuilding. In contrast, neighborhood leaders in eastern New Orleans, which encompasses four ZIP codes to Lakeview's one, are just now undertaking a house-to-house count. Independent research, at first glance, suggests Lakeview and eastern New Orleans have rebuilt at similar rates. GCR and Associates Inc. found last week that based on utility hookups, close to 36 percent of residents in the Lakeview ZIP code were back, versus 33 percent in the eastern New Orleans ZIP codes. However, Richard Campanella, associate director of Tulane and Xavier universities' Center for Biomedical Research, found that the flooding in Lakeview was, by some measures, far more severe. For example, nearly 22 percent of homes in Lakeview got more than 8 feet of water, compared with 3.5 percent in eastern New Orleans. Lakeview has eclipsed eastern New Orleans in real estate sales since Katrina. Sixty-nine houses were sold there nine months before the disaster, compared with 147 during the past nine months of recovery, a 113 percent jump. In eastern New Orleans, 215 single-family homes were sold in the nine months before Katrina, and 287 during the past nine months, a 33 percent increase. As he painted over the rust on an iron fence that ringed his family's home in eastern New Orleans, Hank Long said it was obvious to him that his part of town was rebuilding with sweat equity more often than financial equity. "In Lakeview, many of those houses were already paid for. A lot of people are still paying their mortgages here," said Long, a 60-year-old black man. "Nobody has big money here. They gutted out their house, and that's as far as they got. Whatever they could do, they did on their own." Hulbert of LSU said: "You have to remember the black middle class only took hold in the 1960s. That is different from several generations of middle-class life. Many middle-class blacks in New Orleans were the first in their families to go to college, and it appears many had their entire savings tied up in their homes." David Bell, president of the East New Orleans Neighborhood Advisory Commission, which formed in March to bind together 15 area groups, said a lack of private investment means eastern New Orleans is much more dependent on government recovery aid, with all the bureaucracy and politics that entails. For example, a centerpiece of the eastern New Orleans redevelopment plan is a proposed $100 million shopping strip. But federal grants for the project will not be fully released until the city comes up with 10 percent. Back in Lakeview, residents like to say that they ask mostly one thing of the city: for it to get out of the way. TKTMJ Inc., a builder that is selling modular homes in the neighborhood, found the area so profitable that it established an office in Lakeview and has dubbed one of its designs "The Lakeview." Tommy Callia, a sales representative with the company, noted that most of those able to rebuild are middle class and white. "I think we're not going to be as diverse as we once were, and that's going to be sad," he said. "You can say it's a little like a gumbo: If you don't have all the ingredients, something is missing in the taste." &copy; 1997- 2005 The Advertiser Co. Use of this site signifies your agreement to the
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/J/JERRY_FALWELL?SITE=ALMON&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Make us your homepage May 15, 6:42 PM EDT TV Evangelist Jerry Falwell Dies at 73 AP Photo/STEPHANIE KLEIN DAVIS Televangelist Rev. Jerry Falwell Dies at 73 Michael Reagan says he's glad that the Reverend Jerry Falwell got involved in politics. Jerry Falwell (1933-2007) TV Evangelist Jerry Falwell Dies at 73 A Look at Falwell's Surviving Allies Comments on the Death of Jerry Falwell Falwell Changed U.S. Politics Rev. Jerry Falwell Dies at 73 LYNCHBURG, Va. (AP) -- The Rev. Jerry Falwell was stricken at his campus office and died Tuesday after a career in which the evangelist used the power of television to transform the religious right into a mighty force in American politics. He was 73. The founder of the Moral Majority was discovered without a pulse at Liberty University and pronounced dead at a hospital an hour later. Dr. Carl Moore, Falwell's physician, said he had a heart condition and presumably died of a heart rhythm abnormality. Driven into politics by the 1973 Supreme Court ruling that established the right to an abortion, Falwell founded the Moral Majority in 1979. One of the conservative lobbying group's greatest triumphs came just a year later, when Ronald Reagan was elected president. Falwell credited the Moral Majority with getting millions of conservative voters registered, aiding in Reagan's victory and giving Republicans control of the Senate. "I shudder to think where the country would be right now if the religious right had not evolved," he said when he stepped down as Moral Majority president in 1987. Fellow TV evangelist Pat Robertson, himself a one-time GOP candidate for president, declared Falwell "a tower of strength on many of the moral issues which have confronted our nation." The rise of Christian conservatism - and the Moral Majority's full-throated condemnation of homosexuality, abortion and pornography - made Falwell perhaps the most recognizable figure on the evangelical right, and one of the most controversial ones, too. Over the years, Falwell waged a landmark libel case against Hustler magazine founder Larry Flynt over a raunchy parody ad, and created a furor in 1999 when one of his publications suggested that the purse-carrying "Teletubbies" character Tinky Winky was gay. Matt Foreman, executive director of National Gay and Lesbian Task Force, extended condolences to those close to Falwell, but added: "Unfortunately, we will always remember him as a founder and leader of America's anti-gay industry, someone who exacerbated the nation's appalling response to the onslaught of the AIDS epidemic, someone who demonized and vilified us for political gain and someone who used religion to divide rather than unite our nation." The 1980s marked the religious conservative movement's high-water mark. In more recent years, Falwell had become a problematic figure for the GOP. His remarks a few days after Sept. 11, 2001, essentially blaming feminists, gays and liberals for bringing on the terrorist attacks drew a rebuke from the White House, and he apologized. Falwell's declining political star seemed apparent when he was quietly led in and out of the Republican Party's 2004 national convention. Just four years earlier, he was invited to pray from the rostrum. The big, blue-eyed preacher with a booming voice started a fundamentalist church in an abandoned bottling plant in Lynchburg in 1956 with just 35 members. He built it into a religious empire that included the 24,000-member Thomas Road Baptist Church, the "Old Time Gospel Hour" carried on TV stations around the country and 9,600-student Liberty University, which Falwell founded in 1971 as Lynchburg Baptist College. From his living room, he broadcast his message of salvation and raised the donations that helped his ministry grow. "He was one of the first to come up with ways to use television to expand his ministry," said Robert Alley, a retired University of Richmond religion professor who studied and criticized Falwell's career. Alley died last summer. Falwell had once opposed mixing preaching with politics, but changed his views. The Moral Majority grew to 6.5 million members and raised $69 million as it supported conservative politicians and railed against abortion, homosexuality, pornography and bans on school prayer. Falwell became the face of the religious right, appearing on national magazine covers and on talk shows. In 1983, U.S. News & World Report named him one of 25 most influential people in America. "Jerry's passions and convictions changed the course of our country for the better over the last 20 years," said James Dobson, founder of the conservative Christian Focus on the Family ministry. "It was Jerry who led an entire wing of Christianity, the fundamentalist wing, away from isolation and into a direct confrontation with the culture." "Dr. Falwell was a man of distinguished accomplishment who devoted his life to serving his faith and country," said Sen. John McCain, a GOP presidential contender who during the 2000 primaries referred to Falwell and Robertson as "agents of intolerance." McCain has since distanced himself from those comments. In 1984, Falwell sued Hustler for $45 million, charging that he was libeled by an liquor-ad parody that quoted him as saying he lost his virginity to his mother in an outhouse. A federal jury found the fake ad did not libel him, but awarded him $200,000 for emotional distress. The verdict was overturned in a landmark 1988 U.S. Supreme Court decision that held that even pornographic spoofs about a public figure enjoy First Amendment protection. With Falwell's high profile came frequent criticism, even from fellow ministers. The Rev. Billy Graham once rebuked him for political sermonizing on "non-moral issues." Falwell quit the Moral Majority in 1987, saying he was tired of being "a lightning rod" and wanted to devote his time to his ministry and Liberty University. But he remained outspoken and continued to draw criticism for his remarks. In 1999, he told an evangelical conference that the Antichrist was a male Jew who was probably already alive. Falwell later apologized for the remark but not for holding the belief. A month later, his National Liberty Journal warned parents that Tinky Winky, the children's TV character, was a gay role model and morally damaging to children. Falwell was re-energized after family values proved important in the 2004 presidential election. He formed the Faith and Values Coalition as the "21st Century resurrection of the Moral Majority," to seek anti-abortion judges, a constitutional amendment banning gay marriage and more conservative elected officials. In 1987, Falwell took over the PTL (Praise the Lord) ministry in South Carolina after the Rev. Jim Bakker got caught in a sex and money scandal. Falwell slid fully clothed down a theme park water slide after donors met his fundraising goal to help rescue the rival ministry. He gave it up seven months later after learning the depth of PTL's financial problems. Largely because of the sex scandals involving Bakker and fellow evangelist Jimmy Swaggart, donations to Falwell's ministry dropped from $135 million in 1986 to less than $100 million the following year. Hundreds of workers were laid off and viewers of his television show dwindled. Liberty University was $73 million in debt and on the verge of bankruptcy, and his "Old Time Gospel Hour" was $16 million in debt. By the mid-1990s, two local businessmen with long ties to Falwell began overseeing the finances and helped get companies to forgive debts or write them off. Falwell dreamed that Liberty would grow to 50,000 students and be to fundamentalist Christians what Notre Dame is to Roman Catholics and Brigham Young University is to Mormons. Falwell's father and his grandfather were militant atheists, he wrote in his autobiography. He said his father made a fortune off his businesses - including bootlegging during Prohibition. As a student, Falwell was a star athlete and a prankster who was barred from giving his high school valedictorian's speech after he was caught using counterfeit lunch tickets. He ran with a gang of juvenile delinquents before becoming a born-again Christian at 19. He turned down an offer to play professional baseball and transferred from Lynchburg College to Baptist Bible College in Springfield, Mo. "My heart was burning to serve Christ," he once said in an interview. "I knew nothing would ever be the same again." Falwell had made careful preparations for a transition of his leadership to his two sons, Jerry Falwell, Jr., now vice chancellor of Liberty University, and Jonathan Falwell, executive the pastor of Thomas Road Baptist Church. Falwell is survived by his wife, Macel, his two sons and a daughter, Jeannie Falwell Savas. Funeral arrangements were not immediately known. Former Massachusetts Gov. Mitt Romney, a Mormon whose own faith has become an issue during his run for the presidency, said Falwell "built and led a movement based on strong principles and strong faith," and "the legacy of his important work will continue through his many ministries where he put his faith into action." &copy; 1997- 2005 The Advertiser Co. Use of this site signifies your agreement to the
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/C/CLIMATE_SUMMIT?SITE=ALMON&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Make us your homepage May 15, 5:39 PM EDT Mayors Address Global Warming at Summit Bloomberg: Going Green Good for Business London mayor Ken Livingstone says the cities have a lot to learn from one another about slowing or reversing global climate change. Changes Threatens Species Scientists Get Creative to Battle Climate Change Africa Out of Balance IPCC Report on Climate Change - Adaptation and Vulnerability (PDF) IPCC Report on Climate Change - Physical Impact (PDF) Population Density in Eastern U.S. (PDF) Panel: Climate Change Will Hurt Africa Climate Talks Face International Hurdles U.N. Envoys Seek Input on Climate Change Japan Vows $100M to Stem Climate Change Progress on Global Warming Is Questioned Intel Analysts to Study Climate Change WHO: Green Polices Yield Quick Rewards Green Lobby Pushes Renewable Energy EU Pushes Countries on Global Warming NEW YORK (AP) -- City leaders from around the world declared at an environmental summit Tuesday that they can no longer wait for national governments to reverse global warming and instead must find solutions on their own. Mayors from Seoul to Sao Paulo and Albuquerque to Addis Ababa gathered at the summit, hosted by New York Mayor Michael Bloomberg and former President Bill Clinton, to exchange ideas on how their cities have gone green. "We cannot sit around and watch our environment deteriorate and put this world in jeopardy," Bloomberg said. "The public wants action, and if you have a void, the mayors are going to fill that void." Mayors and local leaders from more than 30 cities kicked off the conference, known as the C40 Large Cities Climate Summit, which first met in 2005 in London. Clinton did not attend Tuesday but was expected to be there Wednesday. Organizers say cities bear a significant responsibility to address climate change because they generate 80 percent of heat-trapping greenhouse gases but cover less than 1 percent of the Earth's surface. "It is in cities that the battle to tackle climate change will be won or lost," London Mayor Ken Livingstone said. The meeting comes at a time when many countries are struggling to address global and national standards for carbon reduction. This week, U.N. delegates are meeting in Germany to gear up for December negotiations on a new set of international rules for controlling greenhouse gas emissions. The new accord would succeed the Kyoto Protocol, which ends in 2012. When the Group of Eight major industrialized countries - the U.S., Britain, France, Germany, Japan, Italy, Canada and Russia - meet in Germany in June, climate change will also be on the agenda. Meanwhile, the mayors said Tuesday, local governments can't wait around. "Where national governments can't or won't lead, cities will," Toronto Mayor David Miller said. Douglas Palmer, mayor of Trenton, N.J., and president of the U.S. Conference of Mayors, said 500 of the nation's mayors have now signed the group's climate agreement, a pledge that is in line with the Kyoto Protocol. That 1997 international treaty requires the industrialized countries that signed it to cut emissions by 5 percent below 1990 levels by 2012; the U.S. did not join the pact. Throughout the first day of the conference, which ends Thursday, participants attended panels on various topics, from water use to transportation. In a discussion on transportation, the mayor of the Brazilian city of Curitiba described his city's solutions, which include a bus rapid transit system, while Livingstone described London's program to reduce traffic by charging motorists extra money in the city center. Bloomberg recently announced his intention to begin a similar traffic charging program in Manhattan. London traffic congestion dropped by 20 percent, and carbon emissions in the central zone similarly decreased, Livingstone said. The fee - equal to about $16 - has gone up since it started in 2003. "People may not like paying the 5 pounds a day, but they certainly didn't want to live with that style of congestion," Livingstone said. He said his city's next goal is to charge more for higher-polluting cars, a pricing scale that could mean a $50 equivalent charge for the worst offenders. Summit organizers invited business leaders to the gathering in an effort to involve the private sector. They hope to convince them that going green - through innovative construction, transportation alternatives and other environmental changes - is profitable. &copy; 1997- 2005 The Advertiser Co. Use of this site signifies your agreement to the
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/M/MISSING_OFFICER?SITE=ALMON&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Make us your homepage May 15, 6:18 PM EDT Search on in S.C. for Missing Officer S.C. (AP) -- Dozens of police officers and bloodhounds searched for a missing constable Tuesday after his empty cruiser was found in flames several miles from where he was last seen at a traffic stop, authorities said. Charleston County Sheriff Al Cannon said authorities had identified a "person of interest" who was being sought on an unrelated weapons charge. But he said officials don't know what happened to Robert Lee Bailey, a 67-year-old constable who works for the Lincolnville Police Department. "It certainly does not look good. But we are hopeful. We have no explanation for what occurred," Cannon said. Bailey was last seen when he pulled a vehicle over about 10:30 p.m. Monday in Lincolnville. Witnesses reported hearing gunshots a few minutes later, and Bailey's cap, two guns, bullet casings and blood were found in a yard. About an hour later, a Highway Patrol officer spotted Bailey's burning car in the parking lot of a church off Interstate 26. The shooting was not believed to be related to the traffic stop, Cannon said. Cannon said officials wanted to speak to a 24-year-old man wanted on a federal weapons charge. Walter Fayall, of St. Stephens, was being sought by the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives. No charges had been filed against him in the missing officer case. The sheriff said authorities are investigating whether Fayall lived in a house near the shooting site. Cannon also said two people may have been involved, since the police cruiser was burned several miles from the shooting scene. Authorities also issued an alert for a black Chevrolet Caprice. Along highways near Lincolnville, a small town about 20 miles west of Charleston, electronic signs listed a fugitive alert. Gary Tucker, data analyst for Faith Assembly of God Church, saw the charred remains of the cruiser early Tuesday. "I just noticed it was a police car and it was torched. And the back window was smashed out," he said. The South Carolina Law Enforcement Division sent agents to help in the investigation, spokeswoman Kathryn Richardson said. Constables assist law enforcement agencies and may carry firearms. They must complete a basic training course at a state technical college before they can be appointed by the governor. During his career, Bailey worked as a law officer for both Dorchester County and the city of Charleston. He worked as a constable with the Charleston County Sheriff's Department and with Lincolnville, Cannon said. One of Bailey's neighbors, Gloria Dearborn, said she hadn't given up hope he would be found alive. "He was wonderful. He's been our neighbor for 25 years," Dearborn said. Associated Press writer Katrina A. Goggins in Columbia contributed to this report. (This version CORRECTS Bailey's age to 67, not 66.) &copy; 1997- 2005 The Advertiser Co. Use of this site signifies your agreement to the
